4594 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: zusammen
  EN TS: They are crying together!
  de TS: Sie weinen zusammen!
  EN FS: They are dancing together!
  de FS: Sie tanzen zusammen!
  EN TP: crying together
  de TP: zusammen weinen
  EN FP: singing together
  de FP: zusammen singen
4595 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: weinen
  EN TS: He can't stop crying.
  de TS: Er kann nicht aufhören zu weinen.
  EN FS: He can't stop laughing.
  de FS: Er kann nicht aufhören zu lachen.
  EN TP: crying on the sofa
  de TP: auf dem Sofa weinen
  EN FP: crying in the shower
  de FP: unter der Dusche weinen
4596 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: Nase
  EN TS: She is blowing her nose.
  de TS: Sie putzt sich die Nase.
  EN FS: She is blowing a bubble.
  de FS: Sie macht eine Kaugummiblase.
  EN TP: blowing her nose
  de TP: sich die Nase putzen
  EN FP: holding her nose
  de FP: sich die Nase zuhalten
4597 | culture (noun): the tastes in art and manners of a social group | loc: Kultur
  EN TS: This culture loves dancing.
  de TS: Diese Kultur liebt das Tanzen.
  EN FS: This culture loves football.
  de FS: Diese Kultur liebt Fußball.
  EN TP: a folk culture festival
  de TP: ein Fest der Volkskultur
  EN FP: a culture of fast food
  de FP: eine Fast-Food-Kultur
4598 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: riesig
  EN TS: Her coffee mug is huge now!
  de TS: Ihr Kaffeebecher ist jetzt riesig!
  EN FS: Her teapot is huge now!
  de FS: Ihre Teekanne ist jetzt riesig!
  EN TP: a huge coffee mug
  de TP: ein riesiger Kaffeebecher
  EN FP: a huge coffee bill
  de FP: eine riesige Kaffeerechnung
4599 | payment (noun): a sum of money paid | loc: Zahlung
  EN TS: Payment in coins and notes.
  de TS: Zahlung in Münzen und Scheinen.
  EN FS: Payment in notes only.
  de FS: Zahlung nur in Scheinen.
  EN TP: a payment in cash
  de TP: eine Zahlung in bar
  EN FP: a payment by card
  de FP: eine Zahlung mit Karte
4600 | exchange (verb): to give something and receive something back | loc: tauschen
  EN TS: He is exchanging money.
  de TS: Er tauscht Geld.
  EN FS: He is exchanging hats.
  de FS: Er tauscht Hüte.
  EN TP: exchanging foreign money
  de TP: ausländisches Geld tauschen
  EN FP: exchanging gifts
  de FP: Geschenke tauschen
4601 | arrange (verb): to put things into a proper order | loc: anordnen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is arranging the cushions.
  de TS: Sie ordnet die Kissen an.
  EN FS: She is arranging the books.
  de FS: Sie ordnet die Bücher an.
  EN TP: arranging sofa cushions
  de TP: Sofakissen anordnen
  EN FP: arranging a meeting
  de FP: ein Meeting organisieren
4602 | search (verb): to search or seek something | loc: durchsuchen
  EN TS: Customs is searching her bag.
  de TS: Der Zoll durchsucht ihre Tasche.
  EN FS: Customs is searching her car.
  de FS: Der Zoll durchsucht ihr Auto.
  EN TP: searching a suitcase
  de TP: einen Koffer durchsuchen
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  de FP: nach einem verlorenen Hund suchen
4603 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: Straße
  EN TS: The road winds through hills.
  de TS: Die Straße schlängelt sich durch Hügel.
  EN FS: The road winds through a city.
  de FS: Die Straße schlängelt sich durch eine Stadt.
  EN TP: a winding mountain road
  de TP: eine kurvige Bergstraße
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  de FP: ein kurviger Gebirgsfluss
4605 | wire (noun): a metal line that carries electricity | loc: Draht
  EN TS: The wire is sparking.
  de TS: Der Draht sprüht Funken.
  EN FS: The wheel is sparking.
  de FS: Das Rad sprüht Funken.
  EN TP: an overhead tram wire
  de TP: ein Oberleitungsdraht der Tram
  EN FP: a farm wire fence
  de FP: ein Drahtzaun auf dem Bauernhof
4606 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: Turm
  EN TS: He is looking up at a tower.
  de TS: Er schaut zu einem Turm hoch.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  de FS: Er schaut zu einem Flugzeug hoch.
  EN TP: a clock on a tower
  de TP: eine Uhr an einem Turm
  EN FP: a clock on a wall
  de FP: eine Uhr an einer Wand
4607 | copper (noun): a reddish-brown metal that bends easily | loc: Kupfer
  EN TS: Big copper tanks behind her.
  de TS: Große Tanks aus Kupfer hinter ihr.
  EN FS: Big plastic tanks behind her.
  de FS: Große Tanks aus Plastik hinter ihr.
  EN TP: shiny copper brewing tanks
  de TP: glänzende Braukessel aus Kupfer
  EN FP: copper coins in a jar
  de FP: Kupfermünzen in einem Glas
4608 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: Menschenmenge
  EN TS: The whole crowd is vibing!
  de TS: Die ganze Menschenmenge feiert voll!
  EN FS: The whole crowd is sleeping!
  de FS: Die ganze Menschenmenge pennt!
  EN TP: a huge dancing crowd
  de TP: eine riesige tanzende Menschenmenge
  EN FP: a football crowd
  de FP: eine Menschenmenge beim Fußball
4610 | dad (noun): an informal word for father | loc: der Papa
  EN TS: Dad is ready to catch her!
  de TS: Papa ist bereit, sie aufzufangen!
  EN FS: Mom is ready to catch her!
  de FS: Mama ist bereit, sie aufzufangen!
  EN TP: jumping into dad's arms
  de TP: in Papas Arme springen
  EN FP: running away from dad
  de FP: vor Papa weglaufen
4611 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: Tochter
  EN TS: Her daughter drew the family.
  de TS: Ihre Tochter hat die Familie gemalt.
  EN FS: Her daughter drew a horse.
  de FS: Ihre Tochter hat ein Pferd gemalt.
  EN TP: a daughter baking with mom
  de TP: eine Tochter backt mit Mama
  EN FP: a daughter shopping with mom
  de FP: eine Tochter shoppt mit Mama
4612 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: verkaufen
  EN TS: He sells the best peaches.
  de TS: Er verkauft die besten Pfirsiche.
  EN FS: He sells the best apples.
  de FS: Er verkauft die besten Äpfel.
  EN TP: selling peaches at a market
  de TP: Pfirsiche auf dem Markt verkaufen
  EN FP: selling apples at a market
  de FP: Äpfel auf dem Markt verkaufen
4613 | earth (noun): the loose soft material of the land surface | loc: die Erde
  EN TS: He is turning the dark earth.
  de TS: Er gräbt die dunkle Erde um.
  EN FS: He is turning the white sand.
  de FS: Er gräbt den weißen Sand um.
  EN TP: turning the dark earth
  de TP: dunkle Erde umgraben
  EN FP: digging in the sand
  de FP: im Sand graben
4614 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: hängen
  EN TS: He is hanging a paper garland.
  de TS: Er hängt eine Papiergirlande auf.
  EN FS: He is hanging a paper lantern.
  de FS: Er hängt eine Papierlaterne auf.
  EN TP: hanging party decorations
  de TP: Partydeko aufhängen
  EN FP: hanging the washing
  de FP: die Wäsche aufhängen
4615 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: bunt
  EN TS: This room is super colorful.
  de TS: Dieses Zimmer ist mega bunt.
  EN FS: This room is super grey.
  de FS: Dieses Zimmer ist mega grau.
  EN TP: colorful party balloons
  de TP: bunte Partyballons
  EN FP: colorful Easter eggs
  de FP: bunte Ostereier
4616 | wood (noun): a large area densely covered with trees | loc: Wald
  EN TS: A wild stag in a misty wood.
  de TS: Ein wilder Hirsch in einem nebligen Wald.
  EN FS: A wild boar in a misty wood.
  de FS: Ein Wildschwein in einem nebligen Wald.
  EN TP: a stag in the wood
  de TP: ein Hirsch im Wald
  EN FP: a table made of wood
  de FP: ein Tisch aus Holz
4617 | fight (verb): to be engaged in a fight | loc: kämpfen
  EN TS: Men in armour are fighting.
  de TS: Männer in Rüstung kämpfen.
  EN FS: Men in suits are fighting.
  de FS: Männer in Anzügen kämpfen.
  EN TP: fighting with shields
  de TP: mit Schilden kämpfen
  EN FP: fighting over a parking space
  de FP: um einen Parkplatz kämpfen
4618 | charge (noun): a sudden rush toward someone or something | loc: Angriff
  EN TS: Here comes the charge!
  de TS: Da kommt der Angriff!
  EN FS: Here comes the rain!
  de FS: Da kommt der Regen!
  EN TP: a charge with shields
  de TP: ein Angriff mit Schilden
  EN FP: a charge for extra bags
  de FP: eine Gebühr für Extragepäck
4619 | raw (adjective): not processed or cooked, in a simple natural state | loc: roh
  EN TS: Raw chicken, raw fish, no dinner yet.
  de TS: Rohes Hähnchen, roher Fisch, noch kein Abendessen.
  EN FS: Raw chicken, raw beef, no dinner yet.
  de FS: Rohes Hähnchen, rohes Rindfleisch, noch kein Abendessen.
  EN TP: a raw frozen chicken
  de TP: ein rohes gefrorenes Hähnchen
  EN FP: a raw egg
  de FP: ein rohes Ei
4620 | overnight (adverb): during or for one night | loc: über Nacht
  EN TS: He is sleeping here overnight.
  de TS: Er schläft hier über Nacht.
  EN FS: He is working here overnight.
  de FS: Er arbeitet hier über Nacht.
  EN TP: stuck overnight at an airport
  de TP: über Nacht am Flughafen festsitzen
  EN FP: an overnight train journey
  de FP: eine Zugfahrt über Nacht
4621 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: Fahrgast
  EN TS: The passengers look like the flight is never coming.
  de TS: Die Fahrgäste sehen aus, als käme der Flug nie.
  EN FS: The pilots look like the flight is never coming.
  de FS: Die Piloten sehen aus, als käme der Flug nie.
  EN TP: tired passengers waiting
  de TP: müde Fahrgäste warten
  EN FP: passengers on a plane
  de FP: Fahrgäste im Flugzeug
4622 | sigh (verb): to breathe out deeply and heavily | loc: seufzen
  EN TS: She is sighing at the ceiling.
  de TS: Sie seufzt zur Decke hoch.
  EN FS: She is sighing at the window.
  de FS: Sie seufzt zum Fenster hin.
  EN TP: sighing at the gate
  de TP: am Gate seufzen
  EN FP: sighing with relief
  de FP: vor Erleichterung seufzen
4623 | vote (noun): a choice made by counting people in favor | loc: Stimme
  EN TS: The votes are falling out.
  de TS: Die Stimmen purzeln heraus.
  EN FS: The coins are falling out.
  de FS: Die Münzen purzeln heraus.
  EN TP: counting the votes
  de TP: die Stimmen auszählen
  EN FP: casting a vote
  de FP: seine Stimme abgeben
4624 | majority (noun): more than half of the votes | loc: Mehrheit
  EN TS: A clear majority!
  de TS: Eine klare Mehrheit!
  EN FS: A clear minority!
  de FS: Eine klare Minderheit!
  EN TP: a clear majority
  de TP: eine klare Mehrheit
  EN FP: a majority of empty chairs
  de FP: eine Mehrheit leerer Stühle
4625 | vote (verb): to express your choice for a candidate | loc: wählen
  EN TS: She is voting like a champion!
  de TS: Sie wählt wie ein Champion!
  EN FS: He is voting like a champion!
  de FS: Er wählt wie ein Champion!
  EN TP: voting with joy
  de TP: voller Freude wählen
  EN FP: voting by post
  de FP: per Brief wählen
4627 | leave (verb): to go away from a place | loc: weggehen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone leaves. He waves!
  de TS: Alle gehen weg. Er winkt!
  EN FS: Everyone stays. He waves!
  de FS: Alle bleiben. Er winkt!
  EN TP: waving as the ship leaves
  de TP: winken, wenn alle weggehen
  EN FP: leaving on a bike
  de FP: mit dem Fahrrad wegfahren
4628 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: traurig
  EN TS: Picnic cancelled. He is sad.
  de TS: Picknick abgesagt. Er ist traurig.
  EN FS: Picnic cancelled. She is sad.
  de FS: Picknick abgesagt. Sie ist traurig.
  EN TP: sad about the rain
  de TP: traurig wegen des Regens
  EN FP: sad about the snow
  de FP: traurig wegen des Schnees
4629 | endless (adjective): seeming to have no end, tiresomely long | loc: endlos
  EN TS: Endless sand, one tiny walker.
  de TS: Endloser Sand, ein winziger Wanderer.
  EN FS: Endless sand, one tiny camel.
  de FS: Endloser Sand, ein winziges Kamel.
  EN TP: endless rows of dunes
  de TP: endlose Reihen von Dünen
  EN FP: an endless queue of cars
  de FP: eine endlose Autoschlange
4630 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: Haarschnitt
  EN TS: He drew the haircut first.
  de TS: Er hat zuerst den Haarschnitt gezeichnet.
  EN FS: He drew the beard first.
  de FS: Er hat zuerst den Bart gezeichnet.
  EN TP: a sharp fade haircut
  de TP: ein scharfer Fade-Haarschnitt
  EN FP: a haircut with long sides
  de FP: ein Haarschnitt mit langen Seiten
4631 | design (verb): to make or work out a plan for something | loc: entwerfen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He designed a birdhouse.
  de TS: Er hat ein Vogelhaus entworfen.
  EN FS: He designed a dog house.
  de FS: Er hat eine Hundehütte entworfen.
  EN TP: designing a birdhouse
  de TP: ein Vogelhaus entwerfen
  EN FP: designing a website
  de FP: eine Website entwerfen
4632 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: der Arbeitsplatz
  EN TS: The workspace is now complete.
  de TS: Der Arbeitsplatz ist jetzt fertig.
  EN FS: The kitchen is now complete.
  de FS: Die Küche ist jetzt fertig.
  EN TP: setting up a workspace
  de TP: einen Arbeitsplatz einrichten
  EN FP: sharing a workspace
  de FP: sich einen Arbeitsplatz teilen
4633 | desperate (adjective): marked by despair or loss of hope | loc: verzweifelt
  EN TS: The old car made him desperate.
  de TS: Wegen des alten Autos ist er verzweifelt.
  EN FS: The old van made him desperate.
  de FS: Wegen des alten Transporters ist er verzweifelt.
  EN TP: desperate in the rain
  de TP: verzweifelt im Regen
  EN FP: desperate for a coffee
  de FP: verzweifelt ohne Kaffee
4634 | reach (verb): to arrive at a destination | loc: erreichen
  EN TS: She reached the town at last!
  de TS: Sie hat die Stadt endlich erreicht!
  EN FS: She reached the lake at last!
  de FS: Sie hat den See endlich erreicht!
  EN TP: reaching the seaside town
  de TP: die Küstenstadt erreichen
  EN FP: reaching for the phone
  de FP: nach dem Handy greifen
4635 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: Reiseziel
  EN TS: She reached her destination.
  de TS: Sie hat ihr Reiseziel erreicht.
  EN FS: She reached her hotel.
  de FS: Sie hat ihr Hotel erreicht.
  EN TP: reaching her destination
  de TP: ihr Reiseziel erreichen
  EN FP: a destination by plane
  de FP: ein Reiseziel per Flugzeug
4636 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: Leuchtturm
  EN TS: She found the real lighthouse!
  de TS: Sie hat den echten Leuchtturm gefunden!
  EN FS: She found the real castle!
  de FS: Sie hat die echte Burg gefunden!
  EN TP: a red-and-white lighthouse
  de TP: ein rot-weißer Leuchtturm
  EN FP: a lighthouse in a storm
  de FP: ein Leuchtturm im Sturm
4637 | destroy (verb): to cause the destruction of something | loc: zerstören
  EN TS: They are destroying the house, and she films it.
  de TS: Sie zerstören das Haus, und sie filmt es.
  EN FS: They are destroying the car, and she films it.
  de FS: Sie zerstören das Auto, und sie filmt es.
  EN TP: destroying an old house
  de TP: ein altes Haus zerstören
  EN FP: destroying an old car
  de FP: ein altes Auto zerstören
4638 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: Schutt
  EN TS: Bye, house. Now it is rubble.
  de TS: Tschüss, Haus. Jetzt nur noch Schutt.
  EN FS: Bye, barn. Now it is rubble.
  de FS: Tschüss, Scheune. Jetzt nur noch Schutt.
  EN TP: a heap of rubble
  de TP: ein Haufen Schutt
  EN FP: clearing away the rubble
  de FP: den Schutt wegräumen
4639 | liquid (adjective): having the characteristics of a liquid, flowing | loc: flüssig
  EN TS: The liquid soap is blue-green.
  de TS: Die flüssige Seife ist blaugrün.
  EN FS: The liquid soap is bright red.
  de FS: Die flüssige Seife ist knallrot.
  EN TP: liquid soap pouring out
  de TP: flüssige Seife läuft heraus
  EN FP: liquid paint on a brush
  de FP: flüssige Farbe am Pinsel
4640 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: Reinigungsmittel
  EN TS: Blue detergent, white shirt!
  de TS: Blaues Reinigungsmittel, weißes Hemd!
  EN FS: Pink detergent, white shirt!
  de FS: Rosa Reinigungsmittel, weißes Hemd!
  EN TP: pouring laundry detergent
  de TP: Reinigungsmittel eingießen
  EN FP: detergent for the dishes
  de FP: Reinigungsmittel fürs Geschirr
4641 | diet (noun): a chosen selection of foods to eat | loc: die Ernährung
  EN TS: Goodbye, doughnuts. Hello, diet.
  de TS: Tschüss, Donuts. Hallo, gesunde Ernährung.
  EN FS: Goodbye, salad. Hello, doughnuts.
  de FS: Tschüss, Salat. Hallo, Donuts.
  EN TP: meal prep for a diet
  de TP: Meal Prep für gesunde Ernährung
  EN FP: a diet of doughnuts
  de FP: eine Ernährung aus Donuts
4642 | pit (noun): a sizeable hole in the ground | loc: Grube
  EN TS: Best pit ever. The dog helped.
  de TS: Beste Grube ever. Der Hund hat geholfen.
  EN FS: Best pit ever. The cat helped.
  de FS: Beste Grube ever. Die Katze hat geholfen.
  EN TP: a deep sand pit
  de TP: eine tiefe Sandgrube
  EN FP: a pit full of snakes
  de FP: eine Grube voller Schlangen
4643 | production (noun): a show made for stage, screen or radio | loc: Produktion
  EN TS: The production is going well!
  de TS: Die Produktion läuft super!
  EN FS: The production is going badly!
  de FS: Die Produktion läuft mies!
  EN TP: a film production at home
  de TP: eine Filmproduktion zu Hause
  EN FP: a factory production line
  de FP: eine Produktionslinie in der Fabrik
4644 | excuse (noun): a defense of some bad behavior or failure | loc: die Ausrede
  EN TS: Work? What a bad excuse.
  de TS: Arbeit? Was für eine schlechte Ausrede.
  EN FS: Rain? What a bad excuse.
  de FS: Regen? Was für eine schlechte Ausrede.
  EN TP: a bad excuse for leaving
  de TP: eine schlechte Ausrede fürs Gehen
  EN FP: an excuse for being late
  de FP: eine Ausrede fürs Zuspätkommen
4645 | attach (verb): to fasten something so it is attached | loc: befestigen
  EN TS: Hands are attaching balls.
  de TS: Hände befestigen Kugeln.
  EN FS: Hands are attaching wheels.
  de FS: Hände befestigen Räder.
  EN TP: attaching balls to rods
  de TP: Kugeln an Stäben befestigen
  EN FP: attaching rods to the wall
  de FP: Stäbe an der Wand befestigen
4646 | divorce (noun): the legal ending of a marriage | loc: Scheidung
  EN TS: Rings off: this is a divorce.
  de TS: Ringe ab: Das ist eine Scheidung.
  EN FS: Rings off: this is a wedding.
  de FS: Ringe ab: Das ist eine Hochzeit.
  EN TP: rings left after a divorce
  de TP: Ringe nach einer Scheidung
  EN FP: a divorce lawyer's office
  de FP: das Büro eines Scheidungsanwalts
4647 | to spin (verb): to turn round and round quickly | loc: sich drehen
  EN TS: He spun too much. Floor time.
  de TS: Er hat sich zu viel gedreht. Ab auf den Boden.
  EN FS: He ran too much. Floor time.
  de FS: Er ist zu viel gerannt. Ab auf den Boden.
  EN TP: spinning on an office chair
  de TP: sich auf dem Bürostuhl drehen
  EN FP: spinning on a dance floor
  de FP: sich auf der Tanzfläche drehen
4648 | examine (verb): to check someone's body for signs of illness | loc: untersuchen
  EN TS: She is examining a small boy.
  de TS: Sie untersucht einen kleinen Jungen.
  EN FS: She is examining a small dog.
  de FS: Sie untersucht einen kleinen Hund.
  EN TP: examining a worried boy
  de TP: einen besorgten Jungen untersuchen
  EN FP: examining a worried cat
  de FP: eine besorgte Katze untersuchen
4649 | teddy (noun): a child's toy bear, plush and stuffed | loc: Teddybär
  EN TS: The teddy is braver than him.
  de TS: Der Teddybär ist mutiger als er.
  EN FS: The puppy is braver than him.
  de FS: Der Welpe ist mutiger als er.
  EN TP: hugging a brown teddy
  de TP: einen braunen Teddybären umarmen
  EN FP: hugging a brown puppy
  de FP: einen braunen Welpen umarmen
4650 | reaction (noun): a process in which substances change into others | loc: Reaktion
  EN TS: The reaction is making foam!
  de TS: Die Reaktion macht Schaum!
  EN FS: The reaction is making smoke!
  de FS: Die Reaktion macht Rauch!
  EN TP: a foaming chemical reaction
  de TP: eine schäumende chemische Reaktion
  EN FP: a quick allergic reaction
  de FP: eine schnelle allergische Reaktion
4651 | marine (adjective): relating to the sea | loc: marin
  EN TS: Marine life at sunset.
  de TS: Marine Tierwelt bei Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: Marine life at noon.
  de FS: Marine Tierwelt zur Mittagszeit.
  EN TP: marine animals jumping
  de TP: springende marine Tiere
  EN FP: a marine in uniform
  de FP: ein Marinesoldat in Uniform
4652 | compete (verb): to take part in a contest against others | loc: antreten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is competing with a man.
  de TS: Sie tritt gegen einen Mann an.
  EN FS: She is competing with a child.
  de FS: Sie tritt gegen ein Kind an.
  EN TP: competing at arm-wrestling
  de TP: beim Armdrücken antreten
  EN FP: competing in a cooking show
  de FP: in einer Kochshow antreten
4653 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: Schlamm
  EN TS: He left the mud on the mat. Mostly.
  de TS: Er hat den Schlamm auf der Matte gelassen. Größtenteils.
  EN FS: He left the snow on the mat. Mostly.
  de FS: Er hat den Schnee auf der Matte gelassen. Größtenteils.
  EN TP: boots covered in mud
  de TP: Stiefel voller Schlamm
  EN FP: mud on the kitchen table
  de FP: Schlamm auf dem Küchentisch
4654 | doubt (noun): the state of being unsure | loc: Zweifel
  EN TS: She has doubts about it.
  de TS: Sie hat Zweifel daran.
  EN FS: She has no doubts about it.
  de FS: Sie hat keine Zweifel daran.
  EN TP: doubts about a shelf
  de TP: Zweifel an einem Regal
  EN FP: doubts about the paint
  de FP: Zweifel an der Farbe
4655 | dress (verb): to put on clothes | loc: sich anziehen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dressing in a suit.
  de TS: Er zieht sich einen Anzug an.
  EN FS: He is dressing in a hoodie.
  de FS: Er zieht sich einen Hoodie an.
  EN TP: dressing in a suit
  de TP: sich einen Anzug anziehen
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  de FP: einen Salat anmachen
4656 | mount (verb): to attach something to a support | loc: montieren
  EN TS: She mounted two shelves.
  de TS: Sie hat zwei Regale montiert.
  EN FS: She mounted two mirrors.
  de FS: Sie hat zwei Spiegel montiert.
  EN TP: mounting shelves on a wall
  de TP: Regale an die Wand montieren
  EN FP: mounting a horse
  de FP: auf ein Pferd steigen
4657 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: trinken
  EN TS: She is drinking coconut water.
  de TS: Sie trinkt Kokoswasser.
  EN FS: She is drinking orange juice.
  de FS: Sie trinkt Orangensaft.
  EN TP: to drink through a straw
  de TP: durch einen Strohhalm trinken
  EN FP: to drink from a tap
  de FP: aus dem Wasserhahn trinken
4658 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: fahren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is driving by the sea.
  de TS: Sie fährt am Meer entlang.
  EN FS: She is driving by a lake.
  de FS: Sie fährt an einem See entlang.
  EN TP: to drive along the coast
  de TP: die Küste entlangfahren
  EN FP: to drive along a river
  de FP: an einem Fluss entlangfahren
4659 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: Auto
  EN TS: All these people are in cars.
  de TS: All diese Leute sitzen in Autos.
  EN FS: All these people are on bikes.
  de FS: All diese Leute sitzen auf Fahrrädern.
  EN TP: people in their cars
  de TP: Leute in ihren Autos
  EN FP: people in their beds
  de FP: Leute in ihren Betten
4660 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: Stapel
  EN TS: Her shopping is one big pile.
  de TS: Ihr Einkauf ist ein großer Stapel.
  EN FS: Her shopping is in one bag.
  de FS: Ihr Einkauf ist in einer Tüte.
  EN TP: a pile of boxes
  de TP: ein Stapel Kartons
  EN FP: a pile of laundry
  de FP: ein Stapel Wäsche
4661 | fall (noun): the season when leaves fall from the trees | loc: Herbst
  EN TS: Fall is here in the park!
  de TS: Der Herbst ist im Park angekommen!
  EN FS: Spring is here in the park!
  de FS: Der Frühling ist im Park angekommen!
  EN TP: yellow leaves in the fall
  de TP: gelbe Blätter im Herbst
  EN FP: fall fashion in a shop
  de FP: Herbstmode im Laden
4662 | supply (verb): to give something useful or necessary | loc: versorgen
  EN TS: A plane is supplying the village.
  de TS: Ein Flugzeug versorgt das Dorf.
  EN FS: A truck is supplying the village.
  de FS: Ein Lastwagen versorgt das Dorf.
  EN TP: supplying a village by air
  de TP: ein Dorf aus der Luft versorgen
  EN FP: supplying a village by boat
  de FP: ein Dorf per Boot versorgen
4663 | drop (noun): a small round shape, like a bead of liquid | loc: Tropfen
  EN TS: A drop is about to land.
  de TS: Gleich landet ein Tropfen.
  EN FS: A bee is about to land.
  de FS: Gleich landet eine Biene.
  EN TP: a single clear drop
  de TP: ein einzelner klarer Tropfen
  EN FP: a drop of rain
  de FP: ein Tropfen Regen
4664 | dose (noun): a measured portion of medicine taken at one time | loc: Dosis
  EN TS: She is counting the dose drop by drop.
  de TS: Sie zählt die Dosis Tropfen für Tropfen ab.
  EN FS: She is counting the dose spoon by spoon.
  de FS: Sie zählt die Dosis Löffel für Löffel ab.
  EN TP: a dose of yellow oil
  de TP: eine Dosis gelbes Öl
  EN FP: a dose of cough syrup
  de FP: eine Dosis Hustensaft
4665 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: Unfall
  EN TS: One accident after another!
  de TS: Ein Unfall nach dem anderen!
  EN FS: One goal after another!
  de FS: Ein Tor nach dem anderen!
  EN TP: a run of small accidents
  de TP: eine Serie kleiner Unfälle
  EN FP: a car accident
  de FP: ein Autounfall
4666 | smash (verb): to hit something hard | loc: zerschmettern
  EN TS: The pumpkin smashed. Oops!
  de TS: Kürbis zerschmettert. Ups!
  EN FS: The egg smashed. Oops!
  de FS: Ei zerschmettert. Ups!
  EN TP: a pumpkin smashing on concrete
  de TP: Kürbis zerschmettert auf Beton
  EN FP: a pumpkin smashing a window
  de FP: Kürbis zerschmettert ein Fenster
4667 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: Flugzeug
  EN TS: The plane is dropping boxes. Air delivery!
  de TS: Das Flugzeug wirft Kisten ab. Lieferung per Luftpost!
  EN FS: The plane is dropping letters. Air delivery!
  de FS: Das Flugzeug wirft Briefe ab. Lieferung per Luftpost!
  EN TP: a plane dropping crates
  de TP: ein Flugzeug wirft Kisten ab
  EN FP: a plane landing on grass
  de FP: ein Flugzeug landet auf Gras
4668 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: riechen
  EN TS: She is smelling the washing.
  de TS: Sie riecht an der Wäsche.
  EN FS: She is ironing the washing.
  de FS: Sie bügelt die Wäsche.
  EN TP: smelling clean washing
  de TP: an frischer Wäsche riechen
  EN FP: smelling the sea air
  de FP: die Meeresluft riechen
4669 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: Wäsche
  EN TS: Laundry with a sea view!
  de TS: Wäsche mit Meerblick!
  EN FS: Laundry with a city view!
  de FS: Wäsche mit Stadtblick!
  EN TP: white laundry on a line
  de TP: weiße Wäsche an der Leine
  EN FP: a bag of dirty laundry
  de FP: ein Sack dreckige Wäsche
4670 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: Dach
  EN TS: She is on the roof.
  de TS: Sie ist auf dem Dach.
  EN FS: She is in the garden.
  de FS: Sie ist im Garten.
  EN TP: washing on a flat roof
  de TP: Wäsche auf einem Flachdach
  EN FP: a cat on a roof
  de FP: eine Katze auf dem Dach
4671 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: Maschine
  EN TS: The blanket is in the machine.
  de TS: Die Decke ist in der Maschine.
  EN FS: The towel is in the machine.
  de FS: Das Handtuch ist in der Maschine.
  EN TP: a washing machine
  de TP: eine Waschmaschine
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  de FP: eine Kaffeemaschine
4672 | reed (noun): tall grasses with hollow slender stems | loc: Schilf
  EN TS: Reeds grow at both edges.
  de TS: An beiden Ufern wächst Schilf.
  EN FS: Trees grow at both edges.
  de FS: An beiden Ufern wachsen Bäume.
  EN TP: tall reeds by the water
  de TP: hohes Schilf am Wasser
  EN FP: a woven reed basket
  de FP: ein geflochtener Schilfkorb
4673 | weak (adjective): lacking physical strength | loc: schwach
  EN TS: He is way too weak for it!
  de TS: Er ist viel zu schwach dafür!
  EN FS: He is way too strong for it!
  de FS: Er ist viel zu stark dafür!
  EN TP: a weak skinny arm
  de TP: ein schwacher dünner Arm
  EN FP: a weak cup of tea
  de FP: ein schwacher Tee
4674 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: Regal
  EN TS: He is dusting the shelves.
  de TS: Er staubt die Regale ab.
  EN FS: He is painting the shelves.
  de FS: Er streicht die Regale.
  EN TP: dusting the shelves
  de TP: die Regale abstauben
  EN FP: building the shelves
  de FP: die Regale aufbauen
4675 | careful (adjective): showing caution, care or attention | loc: vorsichtig
  EN TS: He is not careful at all!
  de TS: Er ist überhaupt nicht vorsichtig!
  EN FS: She is not careful at all!
  de FS: Sie ist überhaupt nicht vorsichtig!
  EN TP: not careful on a bridge
  de TP: nicht vorsichtig auf der Brücke
  EN FP: careful with the tulips
  de FP: vorsichtig mit den Tulpen
4676 | tradition (noun): a pattern of action passed down over time | loc: Tradition
  EN TS: Carrying cheese is a tradition here.
  de TS: Käse schleppen ist hier Tradition.
  EN FS: Carrying fish is a tradition here.
  de FS: Fisch schleppen ist hier Tradition.
  EN TP: an old cheese tradition
  de TP: eine alte Käse-Tradition
  EN FP: an old dance tradition
  de FP: eine alte Tanz-Tradition
4678 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: essen
  EN TS: Everyone is eating something.
  de TS: Alle essen etwas.
  EN FS: Everyone is drinking tea.
  de FS: Alle trinken Tee.
  EN TP: eating a triple burger
  de TP: einen dreifachen Burger essen
  EN FP: eating a salad bowl
  de FP: eine Salatbowl essen
4679 | delicious (adjective): greatly pleasing to taste | loc: köstlich
  EN TS: These tacos are delicious!
  de TS: Diese Tacos sind köstlich!
  EN FS: These burgers are delicious!
  de FS: Diese Burger sind köstlich!
  EN TP: two delicious tacos
  de TP: zwei köstliche Tacos
  EN FP: a delicious cold soup
  de FP: eine köstliche kalte Suppe
4680 | rider (noun): a traveler who rides an animal like a horse | loc: Reiter
  EN TS: A rider is mounting a camel.
  de TS: Ein Reiter steigt auf ein Kamel.
  EN FS: A rider is mounting a horse.
  de FS: Ein Reiter steigt auf ein Pferd.
  EN TP: a rider mounting a camel
  de TP: ein Reiter steigt aufs Kamel
  EN FP: a rider on a horse
  de FP: ein Reiter auf einem Pferd
4681 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: Lampe
  EN TS: So many glass lamps!
  de TS: So viele Lampen aus Glas!
  EN FS: So many glass bottles!
  de FS: So viele Flaschen aus Glas!
  EN TP: a blue glass lamp
  de TP: eine blaue Lampe aus Glas
  EN FP: a blue glass vase
  de FP: eine blaue Vase aus Glas
4682 | trader (noun): someone who buys goods to sell them | loc: Händler
  EN TS: The trader is pouring spice.
  de TS: Der Händler schüttet Gewürz aus.
  EN FS: The trader is pouring tea.
  de FS: Der Händler schüttet Tee aus.
  EN TP: a spice trader
  de TP: ein Gewürzhändler
  EN FP: a stock market trader
  de FP: ein Börsenhändler
4683 | rice (noun): grains used as food | loc: Reis
  EN TS: Rice is all over the counter.
  de TS: Überall auf der Arbeitsplatte liegt Reis.
  EN FS: Salt is all over the counter.
  de FS: Überall auf der Arbeitsplatte liegt Salz.
  EN TP: a bowl of cooked rice
  de TP: eine Schüssel gekochter Reis
  EN FP: a bag of raw rice
  de FP: eine Tüte roher Reis
4684 | elbow (noun): the joint between the forearm and upper arm | loc: Ellbogen
  EN TS: Elbow bump: new handshake.
  de TS: Ellbogen an Ellbogen: der neue Händedruck.
  EN FS: Fist bump: new handshake.
  de FS: Faust an Faust: der neue Händedruck.
  EN TP: bumping elbows at work
  de TP: Ellbogen aneinander im Büro
  EN FP: elbows on the desk
  de FP: Ellbogen auf dem Schreibtisch
4685 | repair (verb): to fix something by replacing a broken part | loc: reparieren
  EN TS: He is repairing the fuse box.
  de TS: Er repariert den Sicherungskasten.
  EN FS: He is repairing the car.
  de FS: Er repariert das Auto.
  EN TP: repairing the fuse box
  de TP: den Sicherungskasten reparieren
  EN FP: repairing a flat tyre
  de FP: einen platten Reifen reparieren
4686 | repair (noun): the act of making something work again | loc: Reparatur
  EN TS: Repair done, lights on!
  de TS: Reparatur fertig, Licht an!
  EN FS: Repair done, water on!
  de FS: Reparatur fertig, Wasser an!
  EN TP: a repair in the dark
  de TP: eine Reparatur im Dunkeln
  EN FP: a car repair shop
  de FP: eine Reparaturwerkstatt für Autos
4687 | embassy (noun): a building where ambassadors live or work | loc: Botschaft
  EN TS: She is at the embassy.
  de TS: Sie ist bei der Botschaft.
  EN FS: She is inside the embassy.
  de FS: Sie ist in der Botschaft.
  EN TP: papers for the embassy
  de TP: Unterlagen für die Botschaft
  EN FP: an embassy party at night
  de FP: eine nächtliche Party in der Botschaft
4688 | massive (adjective): imposing in size or bulk | loc: massiv
  EN TS: Just a massive whale, no big deal.
  de TS: Nur ein massiver Wal, halb so wild.
  EN FS: Just a massive shark, no big deal.
  de FS: Nur ein massiver Hai, halb so wild.
  EN TP: a massive humpback whale
  de TP: ein massiver Buckelwal
  EN FP: a massive storm at sea
  de FP: ein massiver Sturm auf See
4689 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: Boot
  EN TS: A whale next to the boat!
  de TS: Ein Wal direkt neben dem Boot!
  EN FS: A shark next to the boat!
  de FS: Ein Hai direkt neben dem Boot!
  EN TP: a whale by the boat
  de TP: ein Wal am Boot
  EN FP: a dolphin by the boat
  de FP: ein Delfin am Boot
4690 | workplace (noun): a place where work is done | loc: Arbeitsplatz
  EN TS: His workplace is a cubicle.
  de TS: Sein Arbeitsplatz ist eine Bürokabine.
  EN FS: His workplace is a kitchen.
  de FS: Sein Arbeitsplatz ist eine Küche.
  EN TP: a busy open workplace
  de TP: ein offener, belebter Arbeitsplatz
  EN FP: a workplace on a farm
  de FP: ein Arbeitsplatz auf dem Bauernhof
4691 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: Kollege
  EN TS: He is greeting a colleague.
  de TS: Er begrüßt einen Kollegen.
  EN FS: He is greeting a dog.
  de FS: Er begrüßt einen Hund.
  EN TP: greeting a colleague
  de TP: einen Kollegen begrüßen
  EN FP: a colleague on holiday
  de FP: ein Kollege im Urlaub
4692 | product (noun): goods offered for sale | loc: Produkt
  EN TS: He is shelving the products.
  de TS: Er räumt die Produkte ins Regal.
  EN FS: He is shelving the books.
  de FS: Er räumt die Bücher ins Regal.
  EN TP: products on a shelf
  de TP: Produkte im Regal
  EN FP: products in a truck
  de FP: Produkte im Lastwagen
4693 | hire (verb): to engage someone for work | loc: einstellen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boss just hired him.
  de TS: Der Chef hat ihn gerade eingestellt.
  EN FS: The boss just fired him.
  de FS: Der Chef hat ihn gerade gefeuert.
  EN TP: hiring a new worker
  de TP: einen neuen Mitarbeiter einstellen
  EN FP: hiring a holiday car
  de FP: ein Auto für den Urlaub mieten
4694 | contract (noun): a binding agreement enforceable by law | loc: Vertrag
  EN TS: He signed the contract!
  de TS: Er hat den Vertrag unterschrieben!
  EN FS: He tore up the contract!
  de FS: Er hat den Vertrag zerrissen!
  EN TP: signing a contract
  de TP: einen Vertrag unterschreiben
  EN FP: reading a contract at home
  de FP: einen Vertrag zu Hause lesen
4695 | chaos (noun): a state of extreme confusion and disorder | loc: Chaos
  EN TS: He made all this chaos.
  de TS: Er hat dieses ganze Chaos angerichtet.
  EN FS: He cleaned up all this chaos.
  de FS: Er hat dieses ganze Chaos aufgeräumt.
  EN TP: chaos on the floor
  de TP: Chaos auf dem Boden
  EN FP: chaos in the kitchen
  de FP: Chaos in der Küche
4696 | encourage (verb): to inspire someone with confidence | loc: ermutigen
  EN TS: They are encouraging her!
  de TS: Sie ermutigen sie!
  EN FS: They are laughing at her!
  de FS: Sie lachen sie aus!
  EN TP: encouraging a climber
  de TP: eine Kletterin ermutigen
  EN FP: encouraging a child to read
  de FP: ein Kind zum Lesen ermutigen
4697 | start (noun): the beginning of anything | loc: Anfang | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc Anfang wrong for a race start; used Start
  EN TS: He has a lightning start!
  de TS: Er hat einen Blitzstart!
  EN FS: He has a slow start!
  de FS: Er hat einen lahmen Start!
  EN TP: a start from the blocks
  de TP: ein Start aus dem Block
  EN FP: the start of school
  de FP: der Schulbeginn
4698 | motor (noun): a machine that turns energy into motion | loc: Motor
  EN TS: What a huge motor!
  de TS: Was für ein riesiger Motor!
  EN FS: What a huge tyre!
  de FS: Was für ein riesiger Reifen!
  EN TP: a huge V8 motor
  de TP: ein riesiger V8-Motor
  EN FP: a huge boat motor
  de FP: ein riesiger Bootsmotor
4699 | machinery (noun): machines as a group | loc: Maschinerie
  EN TS: He's inspecting the machinery.
  de TS: Er inspiziert die Maschinerie.
  EN FS: He is repairing the machinery.
  de FS: Er repariert die Maschinerie.
  EN TP: old factory machinery
  de TP: alte Maschinerie in der Fabrik
  EN FP: old farm machinery
  de FP: alte Maschinerie vom Bauernhof
4700 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: Roboter
  EN TS: The robot handed him a mug.
  de TS: Der Roboter hat ihm eine Tasse gereicht.
  EN FS: The robot handed him a phone.
  de FS: Der Roboter hat ihm ein Handy gereicht.
  EN TP: a robot holding a mug
  de TP: ein Roboter mit einer Tasse
  EN FP: a robot vacuum cleaner
  de FP: ein Saugroboter
4701 | ruin (verb): to destroy completely | loc: zerstören
  EN TS: The sea ruined it. Thanks, sea.
  de TS: Das Meer hat alles zerstört. Danke, Meer.
  EN FS: The dog ruined it. Thanks, dog.
  de FS: Der Hund hat alles zerstört. Danke, Hund.
  EN TP: a ruined sandcastle
  de TP: eine zerstörte Sandburg
  EN FP: a ruined old church
  de FP: eine zerstörte alte Kirche
4702 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: entkommen
  EN TS: The goat escaped. Bye, farmer!
  de TS: Die Ziege ist entkommen. Tschüss, Bauer!
  EN FS: The cow escaped. Bye, farmer!
  de FS: Die Kuh ist entkommen. Tschüss, Bauer!
  EN TP: escaping from a goat pen
  de TP: aus dem Ziegengehege entkommen
  EN FP: escaping from a fox
  de FP: einem Fuchs entkommen
4703 | raise (verb): to move something from lower to higher | loc: heben
  EN TS: He is raising a green flag.
  de TS: Er hebt eine grüne Fahne hoch.
  EN FS: He is raising a red flag.
  de FS: Er hebt eine rote Fahne hoch.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  de TP: eine Fahne heben
  EN FP: raising a child
  de FP: ein Kind großziehen
4704 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: Hut
  EN TS: He wears a fur hat in a sauna!
  de TS: Er trägt einen Hut aus Fell in der Sauna!
  EN FS: He wears a cap in a sauna!
  de FS: Er trägt eine Basecap in der Sauna!
  EN TP: wearing a fur hat
  de TP: einen Hut aus Fell tragen
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  de FP: einen Hut aus Stroh tragen
4705 | band (noun): a group of people who play music together | loc: Band
  EN TS: The whole town loves the band!
  de TS: Die ganze Stadt liebt die Band!
  EN FS: The whole town hates the band!
  de FS: Die ganze Stadt hasst die Band!
  EN TP: a street band playing
  de TP: eine Band spielt auf der Straße
  EN FP: a band in a stadium
  de FP: eine Band im Stadion
4706 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: schreien
  EN TS: The whole stadium is shouting.
  de TS: Das ganze Stadion schreit.
  EN FS: The whole stadium is sitting.
  de FS: Das ganze Stadion sitzt.
  EN TP: fans shouting in a stadium
  de TP: Fans schreien im Stadion
  EN FP: shouting in a library
  de FP: in der Bibliothek schreien
4707 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: Patient
  EN TS: Best patient ever. He smiles.
  de TS: Bester Patient ever. Er lächelt.
  EN FS: Best patient ever. He sleeps.
  de FS: Bester Patient ever. Er schläft.
  EN TP: a patient with a nurse
  de TP: ein Patient mit einer Pflegerin
  EN FP: a patient in an ambulance
  de FP: ein Patient im Krankenwagen
4708 | guide (verb): to direct the course of someone's travel | loc: führen
  EN TS: A man is guiding the group.
  de TS: Ein Mann führt die Gruppe.
  EN FS: A dog is guiding the group.
  de FS: Ein Hund führt die Gruppe.
  EN TP: guiding a tour group
  de TP: eine Reisegruppe führen
  EN FP: guiding a ship into port
  de FP: ein Schiff in den Hafen führen
4709 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: Gruppe
  EN TS: The whole group is cheering!
  de TS: Die ganze Gruppe jubelt!
  EN FS: The whole group is crying!
  de FS: Die ganze Gruppe weint!
  EN TP: a group in matching hats
  de TP: eine Gruppe mit gleichen Hüten
  EN FP: a group in matching shirts
  de FP: eine Gruppe mit gleichen Shirts
4710 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: Arm
  EN TS: They are swinging their arms.
  de TS: Sie schwingen die Arme.
  EN FS: They are swinging their legs.
  de FS: Sie schwingen die Beine.
  EN TP: arms up over the head
  de TP: Arme hoch über den Kopf
  EN FP: arms crossed over the chest
  de FP: Arme vor der Brust verschränkt
4711 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: Mühe
  EN TS: His face is pure effort.
  de TS: Sein Gesicht zeigt pure Mühe.
  EN FS: His face is pure boredom.
  de FS: Sein Gesicht zeigt pure Langeweile.
  EN TP: rowing with full effort
  de TP: mit aller Mühe rudern
  EN FP: running with full effort
  de FP: mit aller Mühe rennen
4712 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: pusten
  EN TS: He is blowing out all the candles!
  de TS: Er pustet alle Kerzen aus!
  EN FS: He is blowing up all the balloons!
  de FS: Er pustet alle Luftballons auf!
  EN TP: blowing out birthday candles
  de TP: Geburtstagskerzen auspusten
  EN FP: blowing up balloons
  de FP: Luftballons aufpusten
4713 | goodbye (noun): a farewell remark | loc: Abschied
  EN TS: They are waving goodbye.
  de TS: Sie winken zum Abschied.
  EN FS: They are waving hello.
  de FS: Sie winken zur Begrüßung.
  EN TP: waving goodbye from a quay
  de TP: am Kai zum Abschied winken
  EN FP: a goodbye letter
  de FP: ein Abschiedsbrief
4714 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: Experte
  EN TS: The expert says it's genuine.
  de TS: Der Experte sagt, es ist echt.
  EN FS: The expert says it's fake.
  de FS: Der Experte sagt, es ist gefälscht.
  EN TP: an expert with a vase
  de TP: ein Experte mit einer Vase
  EN FP: an expert with a car
  de FP: ein Experte mit einem Auto
4715 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: Wassermelone
  EN TS: The watermelon exploded!
  de TS: Die Wassermelone ist explodiert!
  EN FS: The pumpkin exploded!
  de FS: Der Kürbis ist explodiert!
  EN TP: a bursting watermelon
  de TP: eine platzende Wassermelone
  EN FP: a sliced watermelon
  de FP: eine aufgeschnittene Wassermelone
4716 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: erkunden
  EN TS: He is exploring the jungle like Indiana Jones.
  de TS: Er erkundet den Dschungel wie Indiana Jones.
  EN FS: He is exploring the desert like Indiana Jones.
  de FS: Er erkundet die Wüste wie Indiana Jones.
  EN TP: exploring a jungle cave
  de TP: eine Dschungelhöhle erkunden
  EN FP: exploring a big city
  de FP: eine Großstadt erkunden
4717 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: dunkel
  EN TS: It is so dark in the tunnel!
  de TS: Im Tunnel ist es so dunkel!
  EN FS: It is so dark in the house!
  de FS: Im Haus ist es so dunkel!
  EN TP: a dark rock tunnel
  de TP: ein dunkler Felstunnel
  EN FP: a dark night sky
  de FP: ein dunkler Nachthimmel
4718 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: Auge
  EN TS: Her brown eye fills the frame.
  de TS: Ihr braunes Auge füllt das ganze Bild.
  EN FS: Her blue eye fills the frame.
  de FS: Ihr blaues Auge füllt das ganze Bild.
  EN TP: a torch in an eye
  de TP: eine Taschenlampe am Auge
  EN FP: an eye behind glasses
  de FP: ein Auge hinter der Brille
4719 | chin (noun): the part of the lower jaw that sticks out | loc: Kinn
  EN TS: The chin is round.
  de TS: Das Kinn ist rund.
  EN FS: The chin is pointed.
  de FS: Das Kinn ist spitz.
  EN TP: a rounded chin
  de TP: ein rundes Kinn
  EN FP: a hand on the chin
  de FP: eine Hand am Kinn
4720 | funny (adjective): arousing laughter | loc: lustig
  EN TS: Funny faces and zero shame!
  de TS: Lustige Grimassen und null Scham!
  EN FS: Funny hats and zero shame!
  de FS: Lustige Hüte und null Scham!
  EN TP: funny faces for the phone
  de TP: lustige Grimassen fürs Handy
  EN FP: funny faces for the teacher
  de FP: lustige Grimassen für den Lehrer
4721 | fade (verb): to become less clearly visible | loc: verblassen
  EN TS: Nooo, the rainbow is fading!
  de TS: Neiiin, der Regenbogen verblasst!
  EN FS: Nooo, the rainbow is growing!
  de FS: Neiiin, der Regenbogen wird größer!
  EN TP: a rainbow fading away
  de TP: ein verblassender Regenbogen
  EN FP: a photo fading away
  de FP: ein verblassendes Foto
4722 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: Sonnenbrille
  EN TS: Even the women in sunglasses are fainting!
  de TS: Sogar die Frauen mit Sonnenbrille fallen in Ohnmacht!
  EN FS: Even the women in sunglasses are dancing!
  de FS: Sogar die Frauen mit Sonnenbrille tanzen!
  EN TP: women in dark sunglasses
  de TP: Frauen mit dunklen Sonnenbrillen
  EN FP: sunglasses on a sunny beach
  de FP: Sonnenbrillen am sonnigen Strand
4723 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: fallen
  EN TS: People are falling into foam.
  de TS: Leute fallen in Schaumstoff.
  EN FS: People are falling into water.
  de FS: Leute fallen ins Wasser.
  EN TP: falling into a foam pit
  de TP: in eine Schaumstoffgrube fallen
  EN FP: falling into a pool
  de FP: in einen Pool fallen
4724 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: lachen
  EN TS: She can't stop laughing.
  de TS: Sie kann nicht aufhören zu lachen.
  EN FS: She can't stop crying.
  de FS: Sie kann nicht aufhören zu weinen.
  EN TP: laughing in a foam pit
  de TP: in der Schaumstoffgrube lachen
  EN FP: laughing in a ball pit
  de FP: im Bällebad lachen
4725 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: Pizza
  EN TS: The whole family made pizza.
  de TS: Die ganze Familie hat Pizza gemacht.
  EN FS: The whole family made pasta.
  de FS: Die ganze Familie hat Pasta gemacht.
  EN TP: making pizza dough
  de TP: Pizzateig machen
  EN FP: ordering pizza online
  de FP: Pizza online bestellen
4726 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: Bauer
  EN TS: The farmer is pulling carrots.
  de TS: Der Bauer zieht Möhren aus der Erde.
  EN FS: The farmer is pulling onions.
  de FS: Der Bauer zieht Zwiebeln aus der Erde.
  EN TP: a happy farmer at sunset
  de TP: ein glücklicher Bauer bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a tired farmer at dawn
  de FP: ein müder Bauer im Morgengrauen
4727 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: Vater
  EN TS: This father never gets tired.
  de TS: Dieser Vater wird nie müde.
  EN FS: This mother never gets tired.
  de FS: Diese Mutter wird nie müde.
  EN TP: a father playing catch
  de TP: ein Vater spielt Fangen
  EN FP: a father watching TV
  de FP: ein Vater guckt fern
4728 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: schlafen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping on the sofa. Long day!
  de TS: Sie schläft auf dem Sofa. Langer Tag!
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the floor. Long day!
  de FS: Sie schläft auf dem Boden. Langer Tag!
  EN TP: sleeping on the sofa
  de TP: auf dem Sofa schlafen
  EN FP: sleeping at work
  de FP: bei der Arbeit schlafen
4729 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: ängstlich
  EN TS: The mask made them afraid!
  de TS: Die Maske hat sie ganz ängstlich gemacht!
  EN FS: The clown made them afraid!
  de FS: Der Clown hat sie ganz ängstlich gemacht!
  EN TP: afraid in a haunted house
  de TP: ängstlich im Geisterhaus
  EN FP: afraid of a spider
  de FP: ängstlich vor einer Spinne
4730 | committee (noun): a special group chosen to consider a matter | loc: Ausschuss
  EN TS: The committee has nine people.
  de TS: Der Ausschuss hat neun Mitglieder.
  EN FS: The committee has five people.
  de FS: Der Ausschuss hat fünf Mitglieder.
  EN TP: a committee around a table
  de TP: ein Ausschuss um einen Tisch
  EN FP: a committee on a stage
  de FP: ein Ausschuss auf einer Bühne
4731 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: Nation
  EN TS: Each nation's flag is rising.
  de TS: Die Flagge jeder Nation steigt.
  EN FS: Each nation's flag is falling.
  de FS: Die Flagge jeder Nation sinkt.
  EN TP: the flag of every nation
  de TP: die Flagge jeder Nation
  EN FP: the army of a nation
  de FP: die Armee einer Nation
4732 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: bauen
  EN TS: He is building a wooden fence.
  de TS: Er baut einen Holzzaun.
  EN FS: He is building a wooden shed.
  de FS: Er baut einen Holzschuppen.
  EN TP: building a garden fence
  de TP: einen Gartenzaun bauen
  EN FP: building a sandcastle
  de FP: eine Sandburg bauen
4733 | temperature (noun): the degree of hotness or coldness of something | loc: Temperatur
  EN TS: His temperature is sky high!
  de TS: Seine Temperatur ist extrem hoch!
  EN FS: His temperature is very low!
  de FS: Seine Temperatur ist sehr niedrig!
  EN TP: taking his temperature
  de TP: seine Temperatur messen
  EN FP: the temperature outside
  de FP: die Temperatur draußen
4734 | care (noun): the work of looking after someone | loc: Pflege
  EN TS: She is taking care of her.
  de TS: Pflege mit Herz: Sie kümmert sich um sie.
  EN FS: She is taking care of a dog.
  de FS: Pflege mit Herz: Sie kümmert sich um einen Hund.
  EN TP: loving care on the sofa
  de TP: liebevolle Pflege auf dem Sofa
  EN FP: skin care in the bathroom
  de FP: Hautpflege im Bad
4735 | punch (noun): a blow with the fist | loc: Faustschlag
  EN TS: She is throwing punches.
  de TS: Sie verteilt Faustschläge.
  EN FS: She is blocking punches.
  de FS: Sie blockt Faustschläge.
  EN TP: punches into a padded shield
  de TP: Faustschläge auf ein Schlagpolster
  EN FP: a bowl of fruit punch
  de FP: eine Schüssel Fruchtpunsch
4736 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: Armee
  EN TS: The army is training on sand.
  de TS: Die Armee trainiert im Sand.
  EN FS: The army is training in snow.
  de FS: Die Armee trainiert im Schnee.
  EN TP: an army training together
  de TP: eine Armee beim Training
  EN FP: an army at war
  de FP: eine Armee im Krieg
4737 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: Krug
  EN TS: She's pouring from a jug.
  de TS: Sie gießt aus einem Krug ein.
  EN FS: She's pouring from a bottle.
  de FS: Sie gießt aus einer Flasche ein.
  EN TP: pouring water from a jug
  de TP: Wasser aus einem Krug gießen
  EN FP: a jug of orange juice
  de FP: ein Krug Orangensaft
4738 | everywhere (adverb): in all places, all around you | loc: überall
  EN TS: Her clothes are everywhere!
  de TS: Ihre Klamotten liegen überall!
  EN FS: Her books are everywhere!
  de FS: Ihre Bücher liegen überall!
  EN TP: clothes everywhere
  de TP: überall Klamotten
  EN FP: passports everywhere
  de FP: überall Reisepässe
4739 | discover (verb): to discover that something is there | loc: entdecken
  EN TS: She discovered a huge diamond!
  de TS: Sie hat einen riesigen Diamanten entdeckt!
  EN FS: She discovered a huge ring!
  de FS: Sie hat einen riesigen Ring entdeckt!
  EN TP: discovering a hidden diamond
  de TP: einen versteckten Diamanten entdecken
  EN FP: discovering a new country
  de FP: ein neues Land entdecken
4740 | wound (noun): a cut or open injury on the skin | loc: Wunde
  EN TS: He will clean the wound now.
  de TS: Er macht jetzt die Wunde sauber.
  EN FS: He will clean the bike now.
  de FS: Er macht jetzt das Fahrrad sauber.
  EN TP: cleaning a bleeding wound
  de TP: eine blutende Wunde säubern
  EN FP: a wound on the face
  de FP: eine Wunde im Gesicht
4741 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: ziehen
  EN TS: He is pulling a fish out!
  de TS: Er zieht einen Fisch raus!
  EN FS: He is pulling a boot out!
  de FS: Er zieht einen Stiefel raus!
  EN TP: to pull up a fish
  de TP: einen Fisch hochziehen
  EN FP: to pull a boat ashore
  de FP: ein Boot an Land ziehen
4742 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: stark
  EN TS: She is strong on the ropes!
  de TS: An den Seilen ist sie richtig stark!
  EN FS: She is strong on the bike!
  de FS: Auf dem Rad ist sie richtig stark!
  EN TP: strong arms and legs
  de TP: starke Arme und Beine
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  de FP: ein starker Kaffee
4743 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: Flug | translator note: flight of stairs pun does not travel; FP now wrong on time of day
  EN TS: Juice! Best flight ever!
  de TS: Saft! Bester Flug ever!
  EN FS: Pizza! Best flight ever!
  de FS: Pizza! Bester Flug ever!
  EN TP: a flight at sunset
  de TP: ein Flug bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  de FP: ein Flug bei Nacht
4744 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: entspannen
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the water.
  de TS: Sie entspannt auf dem Wasser.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the sand.
  de FS: Sie entspannt im Sand.
  EN TP: to relax on salty water
  de TP: auf Salzwasser entspannen
  EN FP: relaxing in a hot bath
  de FP: in der heißen Badewanne entspannen
4745 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: fließen
  EN TS: The river flows past pebbles.
  de TS: Der Fluss fließt an Kieseln vorbei.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  de FS: Der Fluss fließt an Häusern vorbei.
  EN TP: water flowing downstream
  de TP: Wasser fließt flussabwärts
  EN FP: water flowing from a tap
  de FP: Wasser fließt aus dem Hahn
4746 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: Fotograf
  EN TS: The jet is flying over the photographers!
  de TS: Der Jet fliegt über die Fotografen!
  EN FS: The bird is flying over the photographers!
  de FS: Der Vogel fliegt über die Fotografen!
  EN TP: photographers at the runway
  de TP: Fotografen an der Landebahn
  EN FP: photographers at a wedding
  de FP: Fotografen auf einer Hochzeit
4747 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: Möwe
  EN TS: The seagulls want his bread!
  de TS: Die Möwen wollen sein Brot!
  EN FS: The seagulls want his hat!
  de FS: Die Möwen wollen seinen Hut!
  EN TP: seagulls around a ferry
  de TP: Möwen um eine Fähre
  EN FP: seagulls on a beach
  de FP: Möwen am Strand
4748 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: Wolke
  EN TS: Only clouds below the wing.
  de TS: Unter dem Flügel nur Wolken.
  EN FS: Only mountains below the wing.
  de FS: Unter dem Flügel nur Berge.
  EN TP: clouds below a plane
  de TP: Wolken unter einem Flugzeug
  EN FP: clouds over the sea
  de FP: Wolken über dem Meer
4749 | formation (noun): a group of people arranged as one unit | loc: Formation
  EN TS: They're falling in formation!
  de TS: Sie fallen in Formation!
  EN FS: They're swimming in formation!
  de FS: Sie schwimmen in Formation!
  EN TP: skydivers in a ring formation
  de TP: Fallschirmspringer in Ring-Formation
  EN FP: a football team formation
  de FP: die Formation einer Fußballmannschaft
4750 | clothes (noun): the clothing you wear | loc: Kleidung
  EN TS: She built a castle of clothes.
  de TS: Sie hat eine Burg aus Kleidung gebaut.
  EN FS: She built a castle of books.
  de FS: Sie hat eine Burg aus Büchern gebaut.
  EN TP: folding clean clothes
  de TP: saubere Kleidung falten
  EN FP: washing dirty clothes
  de FP: schmutzige Kleidung waschen
4751 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: Reiseführer
  EN TS: Guide with a yellow umbrella.
  de TS: Reiseführer mit gelbem Regenschirm.
  EN FS: Guide with a red umbrella.
  de FS: Reiseführer mit rotem Regenschirm.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  de TP: ein Reiseführer mit Regenschirm
  EN FP: a guide in a museum
  de FP: ein Reiseführer im Museum
4752 | failure (noun): an act that fails | loc: Misserfolg
  EN TS: Failure! The oven did it.
  de TS: Misserfolg! Der Ofen war's.
  EN FS: Success! The oven did it.
  de FS: Erfolg! Der Ofen war's.
  EN TP: a baking failure
  de TP: ein Misserfolg beim Backen
  EN FP: a failure in maths
  de FP: ein Misserfolg in Mathe
4753 | forgive (verb): to stop blaming someone and forgive them | loc: vergeben
  EN TS: Plot twist: he forgave him.
  de TS: Plot-Twist: Er hat ihm vergeben.
  EN FS: Plot twist: he ignored him.
  de FS: Plot-Twist: Er hat ihn ignoriert.
  EN TP: forgiving an old friend
  de TP: einem alten Freund vergeben
  EN FP: forgiving his little brother
  de FP: seinem kleinen Bruder vergeben
4754 | protest (verb): to say words that show you disagree | loc: protestieren
  EN TS: He is protesting: "Not me!"
  de TS: Er protestiert: „Ich war's nicht!“
  EN FS: She is protesting: "Not me!"
  de FS: Sie protestiert: „Ich war's nicht!“
  EN TP: protesting to the referee
  de TP: beim Schiri protestieren
  EN FP: protesting in the street
  de FP: auf der Straße protestieren
4755 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: Knochenbruch
  EN TS: The X-ray shows a hand fracture.
  de TS: Das Röntgenbild zeigt einen Knochenbruch in der Hand.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows a leg fracture.
  de FS: Das Röntgenbild zeigt einen Knochenbruch im Bein.
  EN TP: a fracture on an X-ray
  de TP: ein Knochenbruch auf dem Röntgenbild
  EN FP: a fracture in a leg
  de FP: ein Knochenbruch im Bein
4756 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Frankreich
  EN TS: A baguette on a bike? That is France!
  de TS: Ein Baguette auf dem Fahrrad? Das ist Frankreich!
  EN FS: A pizza on a bike? That is France!
  de FS: Eine Pizza auf dem Fahrrad? Das ist Frankreich!
  EN TP: cycling in France
  de TP: Radfahren in Frankreich
  EN FP: skiing in France
  de FP: Skifahren in Frankreich
4757 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: Freiheit
  EN TS: Summer freedom at last!
  de TS: Endlich Freiheit im Sommer!
  EN FS: Winter freedom at last!
  de FS: Endlich Freiheit im Winter!
  EN TP: freedom on an open road
  de TP: Freiheit auf offener Straße
  EN FP: freedom in a big city
  de FP: Freiheit in einer Großstadt
4758 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: voll
  EN TS: Now the fridge is full, bro!
  de TS: Jetzt ist der Kühlschrank voll, Bro!
  EN FS: Now the fridge is empty, bro!
  de FS: Jetzt ist der Kühlschrank leer, Bro!
  EN TP: a fridge full of food
  de TP: ein Kühlschrank voller Essen
  EN FP: a full washing machine
  de FP: eine volle Waschmaschine
4759 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: Bäcker
  EN TS: The baker is talking into a baguette.
  de TS: Der Bäcker spricht in ein Baguette.
  EN FS: The baker is talking into a croissant.
  de FS: Der Bäcker spricht in ein Croissant.
  EN TP: a baker with a baguette
  de TP: ein Bäcker mit Baguette
  EN FP: a baker making pizza
  de FP: ein Bäcker macht Pizza
4760 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: teilen
  EN TS: They are sharing an ice cream.
  de TS: Sie teilen sich ein Eis.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  de FS: Sie teilen sich eine Pizza.
  EN TP: to share an ice cream
  de TP: sich ein Eis teilen
  EN FP: to share a tram ticket
  de FP: sich ein Straßenbahnticket teilen
4761 | bacon (noun): salted and smoked meat from a pig's back | loc: Speck
  EN TS: Bacon on a frozen lake!
  de TS: Speck auf einem zugefrorenen See!
  EN FS: Bacon on a sandy beach!
  de FS: Speck an einem Sandstrand!
  EN TP: frying bacon on the ice
  de TP: Speck auf dem Eis braten
  EN FP: bacon in a sandwich
  de FP: Speck im Sandwich
4762 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: Galerie
  EN TS: He loves this gallery!
  de TS: Er liebt diese Galerie!
  EN FS: He hates this gallery!
  de FS: Er hasst diese Galerie!
  EN TP: a big art gallery
  de TP: eine große Kunstgalerie
  EN FP: a gallery full of cars
  de FP: eine Galerie voller Autos
4763 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: Gamer
  EN TS: These gamers are going crazy!
  de TS: Diese Gamer drehen völlig durch!
  EN FS: These gamers are all asleep!
  de FS: Diese Gamer schlafen alle!
  EN TP: gamers in an arena
  de TP: Gamer in einer Arena
  EN FP: a gamer in a classroom
  de FP: ein Gamer im Klassenzimmer
4764 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: Sofa
  EN TS: She is going wild on the sofa.
  de TS: Sie flippt auf dem Sofa total aus.
  EN FS: She is going wild on the bed.
  de FS: Sie flippt auf dem Bett total aus.
  EN TP: jumping on the sofa
  de TP: auf dem Sofa springen
  EN FP: sleeping on the sofa
  de FP: auf dem Sofa schlafen
4765 | greenhouse (noun): a building with glass walls and roof | loc: Gewächshaus
  EN TS: The garden features a greenhouse.
  de TS: Zum Garten gehört ein Gewächshaus.
  EN FS: The garden features a swimming pool.
  de FS: Zum Garten gehört ein Swimmingpool.
  EN TP: a small glass greenhouse
  de TP: ein kleines Gewächshaus aus Glas
  EN FP: a big plastic greenhouse
  de FP: ein großes Gewächshaus aus Plastik
4766 | garden (verb): to work in the garden | loc: gärtnern
  EN TS: She loves to garden.
  de TS: Sie gärtnert total gern.
  EN FS: She loves to swim.
  de FS: Sie schwimmt total gern.
  EN TP: to garden among flowers
  de TP: zwischen Blumen gärtnern
  EN FP: to garden in the rain
  de FP: im Regen gärtnern
4767 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: Gärtner
  EN TS: The gardener has big shears.
  de TS: Der Gärtner hat eine große Schere.
  EN FS: The gardener has a big axe.
  de FS: Der Gärtner hat eine große Axt.
  EN TP: a gardener with shears
  de TP: ein Gärtner mit Heckenschere
  EN FP: a gardener with a hose
  de FP: ein Gärtner mit Schlauch
4768 | card (noun): a small piece of stiff paper used for games | loc: Karte
  EN TS: He has the winning cards.
  de TS: Mit diesen Karten gewinnt er.
  EN FS: He has the winning dice.
  de FS: Mit diesen Würfeln gewinnt er.
  EN TP: two playing cards
  de TP: zwei Spielkarten
  EN FP: a birthday card
  de FP: eine Geburtstagskarte
4769 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: Zaun
  EN TS: She is standing by a fence.
  de TS: Sie steht an einem Zaun.
  EN FS: She is sitting on a fence.
  de FS: Sie sitzt auf einem Zaun.
  EN TP: a fence along the rim
  de TP: ein Zaun am Rand entlang
  EN FP: a fence around a garden
  de FP: ein Zaun um einen Garten
4770 | boarding (noun): getting on a plane or ship as a passenger | loc: Boarding
  EN TS: Boarding is now in progress.
  de TS: Das Boarding läuft.
  EN FS: Landing is now in progress.
  de FS: Die Landung läuft.
  EN TP: boarding through a jet bridge
  de TP: Boarding über die Fluggastbrücke
  EN FP: boarding at a train station
  de FP: Boarding am Bahnhof
4771 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: Palast
  EN TS: Gate, gate, gate... palace!
  de TS: Tor, Tor, Tor ... Palast!
  EN FS: Gate, gate, gate... church!
  de FS: Tor, Tor, Tor ... Kirche!
  EN TP: a gate to a palace
  de TP: ein Tor zu einem Palast
  EN FP: a palace in a city
  de FP: ein Palast in einer Stadt
4772 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: Schwarm
  EN TS: A huge flock is in the sky.
  de TS: Ein riesiger Schwarm am Himmel.
  EN FS: A huge flock is on the water.
  de FS: Ein riesiger Schwarm auf dem Wasser.
  EN TP: a flock of starlings
  de TP: ein Schwarm Stare
  EN FP: a flock on a lake
  de FP: ein Schwarm auf einem See
4773 | gathering (noun): a group of people together in one place | loc: Versammlung
  EN TS: The music started a gathering.
  de TS: Die Musik hat eine Versammlung ausgelöst.
  EN FS: The music started a fight.
  de FS: Die Musik hat eine Schlägerei ausgelöst.
  EN TP: a gathering around a busker
  de TP: eine Versammlung um einen Straßenmusiker
  EN FP: a family gathering at home
  de FP: eine Familienversammlung zu Hause
4774 | generation (noun): all the people of about the same age alive now | loc: Generation
  EN TS: Every generation is laughing under the apple tree.
  de TS: Jede Generation lacht unter dem Apfelbaum.
  EN FS: Every generation is laughing under the palm tree.
  de FS: Jede Generation lacht unter der Palme.
  EN TP: generations in a garden
  de TP: Generationen im Garten
  EN FP: generations at a dinner table
  de FP: Generationen am Esstisch
4775 | newborn (adjective): born a very short time ago | loc: neugeboren
  EN TS: The newborn has four fans already.
  de TS: Das Neugeborene hat schon vier Fans.
  EN FS: The newborn has two fans already.
  de FS: Das Neugeborene hat schon zwei Fans.
  EN TP: a newborn baby asleep
  de TP: ein neugeborenes Baby schläft
  EN FP: a newborn lamb
  de FP: ein neugeborenes Lamm
4776 | polite (adjective): showing good manners towards other people | loc: höflich
  EN TS: So polite: he is lifting his hat.
  de TS: So höflich: Er lüftet seinen Hut.
  EN FS: So polite: he is lifting his cane.
  de FS: So höflich: Er lüftet seinen Stock.
  EN TP: a polite greeting
  de TP: ein höflicher Gruß
  EN FP: a polite letter
  de FP: ein höflicher Brief
4777 | helpful (adjective): providing useful help to other people | loc: hilfsbereit
  EN TS: He is helpful to everyone.
  de TS: Er ist zu allen hilfsbereit.
  EN FS: He is rude to everyone.
  de FS: Er ist zu allen unhöflich.
  EN TP: a helpful old gentleman
  de TP: ein hilfsbereiter älterer Herr
  EN FP: a helpful young waiter
  de FP: ein hilfsbereiter junger Kellner
4778 | workshop (noun): a small workplace where things are made | loc: Werkstatt
  EN TS: This workshop produces clocks.
  de TS: Diese Werkstatt stellt Uhren her.
  EN FS: This workshop produces shoes.
  de FS: Diese Werkstatt stellt Schuhe her.
  EN TP: a small clock workshop
  de TP: eine kleine Uhrenwerkstatt
  EN FP: a small writing workshop
  de FP: eine kleine Schreibwerkstatt
4779 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Deutschland
  EN TS: He is having fun in Germany!
  de TS: Er hat Spaß in Deutschland!
  EN FS: She is having fun in Germany!
  de FS: Sie hat Spaß in Deutschland!
  EN TP: a trip around Germany
  de TP: eine Reise durch Deutschland
  EN FP: a job in Germany
  de FP: ein Job in Deutschland
4780 | separate (adjective): independent, not joined to each other | loc: getrennt
  EN TS: They are leaving through separate doors.
  de TS: Sie gehen durch getrennte Türen.
  EN FS: They are leaving through the same door.
  de FS: Sie gehen durch dieselbe Tür.
  EN TP: two separate doors
  de TP: zwei getrennte Türen
  EN FP: two separate tables
  de FP: zwei getrennte Tische
4781 | marry (verb): to take someone as your husband or wife | loc: heiraten
  EN TS: She is marrying him!
  de TS: Sie heiratet ihn!
  EN FS: She is leaving him!
  de FS: Sie verlässt ihn!
  EN TP: to marry in a garden
  de TP: im Garten heiraten
  EN FP: to marry on a beach
  de FP: am Strand heiraten
4782 | playground (noun): an open area where people go to play | loc: Spielplatz
  EN TS: She owns the playground!
  de TS: Sie regiert den Spielplatz!
  EN FS: She owns the classroom!
  de FS: Sie regiert das Klassenzimmer!
  EN TP: playing in the playground
  de TP: auf dem Spielplatz spielen
  EN FP: an empty playground
  de FP: ein leerer Spielplatz
4783 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: Paar
  EN TS: The couple is covered in cake!
  de TS: Das Paar ist voller Torte!
  EN FS: The couple is covered in mud!
  de FS: Das Paar ist voller Schlamm!
  EN TP: a couple with cake faces
  de TP: ein Paar mit Tortengesichtern
  EN FP: a couple on a bike
  de FP: ein Paar auf dem Fahrrad
4784 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: geben | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is giving her a present.
  de TS: Er gibt ihr ein Geschenk.
  EN FS: He is giving her a phone.
  de FS: Er gibt ihr ein Handy.
  EN TP: giving a wrapped present
  de TP: ein verpacktes Geschenk geben
  EN FP: giving a big speech
  de FP: eine große Rede halten
4785 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: Terrasse
  EN TS: Cheers on the terrace!
  de TS: Prost auf der Terrasse!
  EN FS: Cheers in the kitchen!
  de FS: Prost in der Küche!
  EN TP: juice on a sunny terrace
  de TP: Saft auf der sonnigen Terrasse
  EN FP: a rooftop terrace party
  de FP: eine Party auf der Dachterrasse
4786 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: funkeln
  EN TS: The sand is sparkling blue!
  de TS: Der Sand funkelt blau!
  EN FS: The sand is sparkling red!
  de FS: Der Sand funkelt rot!
  EN TP: sand sparkling at night
  de TP: Sand funkelt bei Nacht
  EN FP: sand sparkling in the sun
  de FP: Sand funkelt in der Sonne
4787 | valuable (adjective): worth a great amount of money or value | loc: wertvoll
  EN TS: This pan is very valuable.
  de TS: Diese Pfanne ist sehr wertvoll.
  EN FS: This pan is totally empty.
  de FS: Diese Pfanne ist komplett leer.
  EN TP: a valuable pan of gold
  de TP: eine wertvolle Pfanne voller Gold
  EN FP: a valuable old painting
  de FP: ein wertvolles altes Gemälde
4788 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: schockiert
  EN TS: Salon gossip. Everyone is shocked.
  de TS: Klatsch im Salon. Alle sind schockiert.
  EN FS: Salon gossip. Everyone is bored.
  de FS: Klatsch im Salon. Alle sind gelangweilt.
  EN TP: shocked by salon gossip
  de TP: schockiert vom Salon-Klatsch
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  de FP: schockiert vom Preis
4789 | authority (noun): the power to give orders and make decisions | loc: Autorität
  EN TS: She has full authority.
  de TS: Sie hat volle Autorität.
  EN FS: He has full authority.
  de FS: Er hat volle Autorität.
  EN TP: a woman with authority
  de TP: eine Frau mit Autorität
  EN FP: authority over an army
  de FP: Autorität über eine Armee
4790 | conflict (noun): an open clash between two opposing sides | loc: Konflikt
  EN TS: Conflict at the big table, and papers are flying!
  de TS: Konflikt am großen Tisch, und Papiere fliegen!
  EN FS: Peace at the big table, and papers are flying!
  de FS: Frieden am großen Tisch, und Papiere fliegen!
  EN TP: a conflict at the table
  de TP: ein Konflikt am Tisch
  EN FP: a conflict on the street
  de FP: ein Konflikt auf der Straße
4791 | papers (noun): official writing that gives you information | loc: Unterlagen
  EN TS: She is setting down papers.
  de TS: Sie legt Unterlagen ab.
  EN FS: She is setting down flowers.
  de FS: Sie legt Blumen ab.
  EN TP: a folder of papers
  de TP: ein Ordner mit Unterlagen
  EN FP: papers on the floor
  de FP: Unterlagen auf dem Boden
4792 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: pflanzen
  EN TS: They are planting flowers.
  de TS: Sie pflanzen Blumen.
  EN FS: They are picking flowers.
  de FS: Sie pflücken Blumen.
  EN TP: planting a young flower
  de TP: eine junge Blume pflanzen
  EN FP: planting a flag
  de FP: eine Fahne aufstellen
4793 | sand (verb): to rub something smooth with sandpaper | loc: schleifen
  EN TS: They are sanding a birdhouse.
  de TS: Sie schleifen ein Vogelhaus ab.
  EN FS: They are painting a birdhouse.
  de FS: Sie streichen ein Vogelhaus an.
  EN TP: sanding a wooden roof
  de TP: ein Holzdach schleifen
  EN FP: sanding a wooden floor
  de FP: einen Holzboden schleifen
4794 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: Großmutter
  EN TS: Grandmother's cookies win.
  de TS: Großmutters Kekse gewinnen.
  EN FS: Grandmother's pizza wins.
  de FS: Großmutters Pizza gewinnt.
  EN TP: cookies from grandmother
  de TP: Kekse von Großmutter
  EN FP: cookies from a shop
  de FP: Kekse aus dem Laden
4795 | to bake (verb): to cook food by putting it in a hot oven | loc: backen
  EN TS: She baked cookies. Best day!
  de TS: Sie hat Kekse gebacken. Bester Tag!
  EN FS: She baked a pie. Best day!
  de FS: Sie hat einen Kuchen gebacken. Bester Tag!
  EN TP: baked chocolate cookies
  de TP: gebackene Schokokekse
  EN FP: baked apple pies
  de FP: gebackene Apfelkuchen
4796 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: balancieren
  EN TS: He is balancing two cards. Careful!
  de TS: Er balanciert zwei Karten. Vorsicht!
  EN FS: He is balancing two cups. Careful!
  de FS: Er balanciert zwei Tassen. Vorsicht!
  EN TP: balancing playing cards
  de TP: Spielkarten balancieren
  EN FP: balancing on one leg
  de FP: auf einem Bein balancieren
4797 | little (adjective): below average in number or quantity | loc: wenig
  EN TS: He adds just a little cheese.
  de TS: Er gibt nur ein wenig Käse dazu.
  EN FS: He adds just a little sauce.
  de FS: Er gibt nur ein wenig Soße dazu.
  EN TP: a little extra cheese
  de TP: ein wenig extra Käse
  EN FP: a little extra pepper
  de FP: ein wenig extra Pfeffer
4798 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: Tempel
  EN TS: She is walking to a temple.
  de TS: Sie geht zu einem Tempel.
  EN FS: She is walking to a church.
  de FS: Sie geht zu einer Kirche.
  EN TP: an old hilltop temple
  de TP: ein alter Tempel auf dem Hügel
  EN FP: an old hilltop castle
  de FP: eine alte Burg auf dem Hügel
4799 | tie (verb): to fasten something with a cord or string | loc: binden
  EN TS: Tying a bow tie? Nervous work!
  de TS: Eine Fliege binden? Nervenkram!
  EN FS: Tying his shoes? Nervous work!
  de FS: Die Schuhe binden? Nervenkram!
  EN TP: tying a black bow tie
  de TP: eine schwarze Fliege binden
  EN FP: tying up the suitcase
  de FP: den Koffer zubinden
4800 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: Bräutigam
  EN TS: The groom is so nervous!
  de TS: Der Bräutigam ist so nervös!
  EN FS: The bride is so nervous!
  de FS: Die Braut ist so nervös!
  EN TP: a nervous groom
  de TP: ein nervöser Bräutigam
  EN FP: a groom feeding a horse
  de FP: ein Bräutigam füttert ein Pferd
4801 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: hoch
  EN TS: This sunflower is so tall!
  de TS: Diese Sonnenblume ist so hoch!
  EN FS: This cactus is so tall!
  de FS: Dieser Kaktus ist so hoch!
  EN TP: a tall sunflower
  de TP: eine hohe Sonnenblume
  EN FP: a tall tree
  de FP: ein hoher Baum
4802 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: Museum
  EN TS: This guard is the museum boss.
  de TS: Dieser Wachmann ist der Chef vom Museum.
  EN FS: This cook is the museum boss.
  de FS: Dieser Koch ist der Chef vom Museum.
  EN TP: a museum guard
  de TP: ein Wächter im Museum
  EN FP: a guard at a bank
  de FP: ein Wächter in der Bank
4803 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: Blumenstrauß
  EN TS: She brought a bouquet.
  de TS: Sie hat einen Blumenstrauß mitgebracht.
  EN FS: She brought a cake.
  de FS: Sie hat einen Kuchen mitgebracht.
  EN TP: a bouquet for the host
  de TP: ein Blumenstrauß für die Gastgeberin
  EN FP: a bouquet for a bride
  de FP: ein Blumenstrauß für die Braut
4804 | tour (verb): to make a trip round a place to see it | loc: besichtigen
  EN TS: They are touring a blue town.
  de TS: Sie besichtigen eine blaue Stadt.
  EN FS: They are touring a red town.
  de FS: Sie besichtigen eine rote Stadt.
  EN TP: touring a blue town
  de TP: eine blaue Stadt besichtigen
  EN FP: touring with a rock band
  de FP: mit einer Rockband auf Tour
4805 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: Kirche
  EN TS: He is pointing at a church.
  de TS: Er zeigt auf eine Kirche.
  EN FS: He is pointing at a boat.
  de FS: Er zeigt auf ein Boot.
  EN TP: a domed church
  de TP: eine Kirche mit Kuppel
  EN FP: a wooden church
  de FP: eine Kirche aus Holz
4806 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: Kuppel
  EN TS: A dome is behind his book.
  de TS: Hinter seinem Buch ist eine Kuppel.
  EN FS: A crane is behind his book.
  de FS: Hinter seinem Buch ist ein Kran.
  EN TP: a dome on the skyline
  de TP: eine Kuppel in der Skyline
  EN FP: a dome tent for camping
  de FP: ein Kuppelzelt zum Campen
4807 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: orange
  EN TS: He is wearing an orange top.
  de TS: Sein Sportshirt ist orange.
  EN FS: He is wearing an orange cap.
  de FS: Seine Cap ist orange.
  EN TP: an orange sports top
  de TP: ein Sportshirt in Orange
  EN FP: an orange sports car
  de FP: ein Sportwagen in Orange
4808 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: Zopf
  EN TS: The stylist is making a braid.
  de TS: Die Stylistin flicht einen Zopf.
  EN FS: The stylist is making a bun.
  de FS: Die Stylistin macht einen Dutt.
  EN TP: weaving a long braid
  de TP: einen langen Zopf flechten
  EN FP: cutting a long braid
  de FP: einen langen Zopf abschneiden
4809 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: Korridor
  EN TS: It's rush hour in the corridor.
  de TS: Im Korridor ist Rushhour.
  EN FS: It's rush hour in the bathroom.
  de FS: Im Badezimmer ist Rushhour.
  EN TP: a corridor full of shoes
  de TP: ein Korridor voller Schuhe
  EN FP: a long hotel corridor
  de FP: ein langer Hotelkorridor
4810 | post (noun): a piece of timber fixed upright in the ground | loc: Pfosten
  EN TS: He is hammering a post in.
  de TS: Er schlägt einen Pfosten ein.
  EN FS: He is hammering a nail in.
  de FS: Er schlägt einen Nagel ein.
  EN TP: a post in the ground
  de TP: ein Pfosten im Boden
  EN FP: a post on social media
  de FP: ein Post auf Social Media
4811 | teammate (noun): someone who is on the same team as you | loc: Teamkollege
  EN TS: The teammates are hyped up.
  de TS: Die Teamkollegen sind voll gehypt.
  EN FS: The teammates are fighting.
  de FS: Die Teamkollegen streiten sich.
  EN TP: hands in with teammates
  de TP: Hände rein mit den Teamkollegen
  EN FP: arguing with teammates
  de FP: Streit mit den Teamkollegen
4812 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: ordentlich
  EN TS: His wardrobe is super tidy.
  de TS: Sein Kleiderschrank ist mega ordentlich.
  EN FS: His wardrobe is super messy.
  de FS: Sein Kleiderschrank ist mega chaotisch.
  EN TP: a tidy row of shirts
  de TP: eine ordentliche Reihe Hemden
  EN FP: a tidy pile of shoes
  de FP: ein ordentlicher Stapel Schuhe
4813 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: Hafen
  EN TS: The harbour is busy.
  de TS: Der Hafen ist belebt.
  EN FS: The harbour is empty.
  de FS: Der Hafen ist leer.
  EN TP: a busy harbour at sunrise
  de TP: ein belebter Hafen bei Sonnenaufgang
  EN FP: a harbour in a storm
  de FP: ein Hafen im Sturm
4814 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: pflücken
  EN TS: The team is picking tomatoes.
  de TS: Das Team pflückt Tomaten.
  EN FS: The team is picking apples.
  de FS: Das Team pflückt Äpfel.
  EN TP: picking a red tomato
  de TP: eine rote Tomate pflücken
  EN FP: picking a red apple
  de FP: einen roten Apfel pflücken
4815 | rub (verb): to move your hand over something with pressure | loc: reiben
  EN TS: Office stress: rubbing her temples.
  de TS: Bürostress: Sie reibt sich die Schläfen.
  EN FS: Office stress: rubbing her feet.
  de FS: Bürostress: Sie reibt sich die Füße.
  EN TP: rubbing her temples
  de TP: sich die Schläfen reiben
  EN FP: rubbing her hands together
  de FP: sich die Hände reiben
4816 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: Herz
  EN TS: Her heart is racing!
  de TS: Ihr Herz rast!
  EN FS: Her heart is resting!
  de FS: Ihr Herz ruht!
  EN TP: a hand over the heart
  de TP: eine Hand aufs Herz
  EN FP: a heart on her shirt
  de FP: ein Herz auf ihrem Shirt
4817 | drought (noun): a long time with a shortage of rain | loc: Dürre
  EN TS: Even the tree melts in this drought.
  de TS: Bei dieser Dürre schmilzt sogar der Baum.
  EN FS: Even the dog melts in this drought.
  de FS: Bei dieser Dürre schmilzt sogar der Hund.
  EN TP: a drought with cracked ground
  de TP: Dürre mit rissigem Boden
  EN FP: the end of a drought
  de FP: das Ende einer Dürre
4818 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: Ferse
  EN TS: Spikes under the heel? Crazy!
  de TS: Spikes unter der Ferse? Verrückt!
  EN FS: Wheels under the heel? Crazy!
  de FS: Rollen unter der Ferse? Verrückt!
  EN TP: a spike under the heel
  de TP: ein Spike unter der Ferse
  EN FP: the heel of a shoe
  de FP: der Absatz eines Schuhs
4819 | grateful (adjective): feeling or showing thanks to someone | loc: dankbar
  EN TS: The old woman is grateful.
  de TS: Die alte Frau ist dankbar.
  EN FS: The old man is grateful.
  de FS: Der alte Mann ist dankbar.
  EN TP: grateful for the umbrella
  de TP: dankbar für den Schirm
  EN FP: grateful for the taxi
  de FP: dankbar für das Taxi
4820 | same (adjective): the same one, not a different one | loc: gleich
  EN TS: They have the same dress!
  de TS: Sie haben das gleiche Kleid!
  EN FS: They have the same bag!
  de FS: Sie haben die gleiche Tasche!
  EN TP: the same patterned dress
  de TP: das gleiche gemusterte Kleid
  EN FP: the same shoes
  de FP: die gleichen Schuhe
4821 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: Sonnenuntergang
  EN TS: Sunset pizza is here!
  de TS: Pizza zum Sonnenuntergang ist da!
  EN FS: Sunset sushi is here!
  de FS: Sushi zum Sonnenuntergang ist da!
  EN TP: pizza delivery at sunset
  de TP: Pizzalieferung bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a sunset over the mountains
  de FP: ein Sonnenuntergang über den Bergen
4822 | message (noun): a short written or spoken communication | loc: Nachricht
  EN TS: The message made her so happy.
  de TS: Die Nachricht hat sie so glücklich gemacht.
  EN FS: The message made her so sad.
  de FS: Die Nachricht hat sie so traurig gemacht.
  EN TP: reading a happy message
  de TP: eine fröhliche Nachricht lesen
  EN FP: a message on the fridge
  de FP: eine Nachricht am Kühlschrank
4823 | depth (noun): how far downward something goes | loc: Tiefe
  EN TS: He is diving to a great depth.
  de TS: Er taucht in große Tiefe.
  EN FS: He is diving to a small depth.
  de FS: Er taucht in geringe Tiefe.
  EN TP: diving to a great depth
  de TP: in große Tiefe tauchen
  EN FP: the depth of a pool
  de FP: die Tiefe eines Pools
4824 | pretend (verb): to make believe something is real | loc: so tun, als ob
  EN TS: Her horse is fake, but she pretends well.
  de TS: Ihr Pferd ist fake, aber sie tut sehr gut so, als ob.
  EN FS: Her horse is fake, but she swims well.
  de FS: Ihr Pferd ist fake, aber sie schwimmt sehr gut.
  EN TP: pretending to ride a horse
  de TP: so tun, als ob man reitet
  EN FP: pretending to be asleep
  de FP: so tun, als ob man schläft
4825 | to wipe (verb): to clean a surface by rubbing it with a cloth | loc: abwischen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Worktop wiped. Kitchen done.
  de TS: Arbeitsplatte abgewischt. Küche fertig.
  EN FS: Window wiped. Kitchen done.
  de FS: Fenster abgewischt. Küche fertig.
  EN TP: wiping the white worktop
  de TP: die weiße Arbeitsplatte abwischen
  EN FP: wiping away tears
  de FP: Tränen abwischen
4826 | dam (noun): a barrier built to hold back water | loc: Staudamm
  EN TS: The dam is overflowing!
  de TS: Der Staudamm läuft über!
  EN FS: The pool is overflowing!
  de FS: Der Pool läuft über!
  EN TP: an overflowing dam
  de TP: ein überlaufender Staudamm
  EN FP: a dry dam in summer
  de FP: ein trockener Staudamm im Sommer
4827 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: Farbe
  EN TS: This orange paint is thick.
  de TS: Diese Farbe in Orange ist richtig dick.
  EN FS: This blue paint is thick.
  de FS: Diese Farbe in Blau ist richtig dick.
  EN TP: a thick slab of paint
  de TP: eine dicke Schicht Farbe
  EN FP: a fresh coat of paint
  de FP: frische Farbe an der Wand
4828 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: Wand
  EN TS: Half the wall is green now.
  de TS: Die Hälfte der Wand ist jetzt grün.
  EN FS: Half the wall is blue now.
  de FS: Die Hälfte der Wand ist jetzt blau.
  EN TP: a half-green wall
  de TP: eine halb grüne Wand
  EN FP: a green garden wall
  de FP: eine grüne Gartenmauer
4829 | chip (noun): a small piece broken off something | loc: Splitter
  EN TS: Paint chips are falling off.
  de TS: Farbsplitter fallen ab.
  EN FS: Paint drops are falling off.
  de FS: Farbtropfen fallen ab.
  EN TP: chips of old paint
  de TP: Splitter von alter Farbe
  EN FP: chips of old glass
  de FP: Splitter von altem Glas
4830 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: schwimmen
  EN TS: Two divers are swimming up.
  de TS: Zwei Taucher schwimmen nach oben.
  EN FS: Three divers are swimming up.
  de FS: Drei Taucher schwimmen nach oben.
  EN TP: swimming up to the surface
  de TP: zur Oberfläche schwimmen
  EN FP: to swim across the river
  de FP: über den Fluss schwimmen
4831 | hit (noun): a successful stroke of the bat in baseball | loc: Schlag
  EN TS: What a big hit!
  de TS: Was für ein starker Schlag!
  EN FS: What a big miss!
  de FS: Was für ein Fehlschlag!
  EN TP: a hit off a tee
  de TP: ein Schlag vom Tee
  EN FP: a hit on the radio
  de FP: ein Hit im Radio
4832 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: Bergkamm
  EN TS: A thin ridge above the clouds.
  de TS: Ein schmaler Bergkamm über den Wolken.
  EN FS: A wide ridge above the clouds.
  de FS: Ein breiter Bergkamm über den Wolken.
  EN TP: a thin snow ridge
  de TP: ein schmaler Bergkamm im Schnee
  EN FP: a ridge of green hills
  de FP: ein grüner Hügelkamm
4833 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: Küste
  EN TS: He is skating along the coast like it is nothing.
  de TS: Er skatet an der Küste entlang, als wäre es nichts.
  EN FS: He is cycling along the coast like it is nothing.
  de FS: Er radelt an der Küste entlang, als wäre es nichts.
  EN TP: skating down the coast road
  de TP: die Küstenstraße runterskaten
  EN FP: sailing along the coast
  de FP: an der Küste entlangsegeln
4834 | toy (noun): a thing designed to be played with | loc: Spielzeug
  EN TS: This toy battle is epic!
  de TS: Dieser Spielzeug-Kampf ist episch!
  EN FS: This card battle is epic!
  de FS: Dieser Karten-Kampf ist episch!
  EN TP: a spinning toy
  de TP: ein Kreiselspielzeug
  EN FP: a toy car
  de FP: ein Spielzeugauto
4836 | saw (verb): to cut something using a saw | loc: sägen
  EN TS: He is sawing out a bear.
  de TS: Er sägt einen Bären aus.
  EN FS: He is sawing out a horse.
  de FS: Er sägt ein Pferd aus.
  EN TP: sawing a bear from wood
  de TP: einen Bären aus Holz sägen
  EN FP: sawing a plank in half
  de FP: ein Brett durchsägen
4837 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: Tisch
  EN TS: The table is full of food.
  de TS: Der Tisch ist voller Essen.
  EN FS: The table is full of books.
  de FS: Der Tisch ist voller Bücher.
  EN TP: a table full of food
  de TP: ein Tisch voller Essen
  EN FP: a table full of games
  de FP: ein Tisch voller Spiele
4838 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: werfen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is throwing a ball.
  de TS: Sie wirft einen Ball.
  EN FS: She is kicking a ball.
  de FS: Sie kickt einen Ball.
  EN TP: to throw a beach ball
  de TP: einen Wasserball werfen
  EN FP: to throw a party
  de FP: eine Party schmeißen
4839 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: sich bewegen
  EN TS: He can move a car alone!
  de TS: Er kann allein ein Auto bewegen!
  EN FS: He can move a bus alone!
  de FS: Er kann allein einen Bus bewegen!
  EN TP: moving heavy things
  de TP: schwere Dinge bewegen
  EN FP: moving to a new city
  de FP: in eine neue Stadt ziehen
4840 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: verstecken
  EN TS: They hid for a surprise!
  de TS: Sie haben sich für eine Überraschung versteckt!
  EN FS: They hid from a dog!
  de FS: Sie haben sich vor einem Hund versteckt!
  EN TP: hiding behind the sofa
  de TP: sich hinter dem Sofa verstecken
  EN FP: hiding under the bed
  de FP: sich unter dem Bett verstecken
4841 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: Schlüssel
  EN TS: She found the key! Finally!
  de TS: Sie hat den Schlüssel gefunden! Endlich!
  EN FS: She found the phone! Finally!
  de FS: Sie hat das Handy gefunden! Endlich!
  EN TP: finding a small key
  de TP: einen kleinen Schlüssel finden
  EN FP: losing a small key
  de FP: einen kleinen Schlüssel verlieren
4842 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: arbeiten
  EN TS: He is working on an old car.
  de TS: Er arbeitet an einem alten Auto.
  EN FS: He is working on an old bike.
  de FS: Er arbeitet an einem alten Fahrrad.
  EN TP: working on a car engine
  de TP: am Automotor arbeiten
  EN FP: working in an office
  de FP: im Büro arbeiten
4843 | structure (noun): a thing built from many parts | loc: Konstruktion
  EN TS: That is one big wooden structure!
  de TS: Das ist mal eine riesige Holzkonstruktion!
  EN FS: That is one big metal structure!
  de FS: Das ist mal eine riesige Metallkonstruktion!
  EN TP: a wooden house structure
  de TP: eine Hauskonstruktion aus Holz
  EN FP: the structure of a sentence
  de FP: die Konstruktion eines Satzes
4844 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: Hälfte
  EN TS: She cut the pumpkin in half.
  de TS: Sie hat den Kürbis in zwei Hälften geschnitten.
  EN FS: She cut the cake in half.
  de FS: Sie hat den Kuchen in zwei Hälften geschnitten.
  EN TP: a pumpkin cut in half
  de TP: ein Kürbis in zwei Hälften
  EN FP: half a pumpkin pie
  de FP: ein halber Kürbiskuchen
4845 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: Tuch
  EN TS: Hands are sewing the cloth.
  de TS: Hände nähen das Tuch.
  EN FS: Hands are cutting the cloth.
  de FS: Hände schneiden das Tuch.
  EN TP: stitching the cloth
  de TP: das Tuch nähen
  EN FP: wiping with a cloth
  de FP: mit einem Tuch wischen
4846 | iron (verb): to press clothes smooth with a hot iron | loc: bügeln
  EN TS: Ironing done: one flat sheet.
  de TS: Bügeln erledigt: ein glattes Laken.
  EN FS: Ironing done: one flat towel.
  de FS: Bügeln erledigt: ein glattes Handtuch.
  EN TP: ironing a white sheet
  de TP: ein weißes Laken bügeln
  EN FP: ironing out a problem
  de FP: ein Problem ausbügeln
4847 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: Boden
  EN TS: What a clean floor!
  de TS: Was für ein sauberer Boden!
  EN FS: What a dirty floor!
  de FS: Was für ein dreckiger Boden!
  EN TP: mopping the floor
  de TP: den Boden wischen
  EN FP: painting the floor
  de FP: den Boden streichen
4848 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: wachsen
  EN TS: Look what she grew: a pumpkin!
  de TS: Schau, was bei ihr gewachsen ist: ein Kürbis!
  EN FS: Look what she grew: a melon!
  de FS: Schau, was bei ihr gewachsen ist: eine Melone!
  EN TP: growing a big pumpkin
  de TP: einen großen Kürbis wachsen lassen
  EN FP: growing a long beard
  de FP: sich einen langen Bart wachsen lassen
4849 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: Sommer
  EN TS: Summer: water for everyone!
  de TS: Sommer: Wasser für alle!
  EN FS: Summer: cake for everyone!
  de FS: Sommer: Kuchen für alle!
  EN TP: a summer garden sprinkler
  de TP: ein Rasensprenger im Sommer
  EN FP: a summer beach day
  de FP: ein Sommertag am Strand
4850 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: Kamera
  EN TS: He is pointing a camera at us!
  de TS: Er richtet eine Kamera auf uns!
  EN FS: He is pointing a phone at us!
  de FS: Er richtet ein Handy auf uns!
  EN TP: a camera on a tripod
  de TP: eine Kamera auf einem Stativ
  EN FP: a camera in a shop
  de FP: eine Kamera im Laden
4851 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: uralt
  EN TS: She found an ancient tablet!
  de TS: Sie hat eine uralte Tafel gefunden!
  EN FS: She found an ancient sword!
  de FS: Sie hat ein uraltes Schwert gefunden!
  EN TP: an ancient stone tablet
  de TP: eine uralte Steintafel
  EN FP: an ancient ship
  de FP: ein uraltes Schiff
4852 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: Zahnrad
  EN TS: Huge gears at the end!
  de TS: Riesige Zahnräder am Ende!
  EN FS: Tiny gears at the end!
  de FS: Winzige Zahnräder am Ende!
  EN TP: huge interlocking gears
  de TP: riesige ineinandergreifende Zahnräder
  EN FP: bike gears
  de FP: Zahnräder am Fahrrad
4853 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: winzig
  EN TS: That cog is super tiny.
  de TS: Das Zahnrad ist mega winzig.
  EN FS: That screw is super tiny.
  de FS: Die Schraube ist mega winzig.
  EN TP: a tiny brass cog
  de TP: ein winziges Zahnrad aus Messing
  EN FP: a tiny kitchen
  de FP: eine winzige Küche
4854 | solve (verb): to find the solution to a problem | loc: lösen
  EN TS: He is solving a huge problem!
  de TS: Er löst ein riesiges Problem!
  EN FS: He is solving a tiny problem!
  de FS: Er löst ein winziges Problem!
  EN TP: solving maths on a board
  de TP: Mathe an der Tafel lösen
  EN FP: solving a crime
  de FP: einen Kriminalfall lösen
4855 | remember (verb): to recall something from your memory | loc: sich erinnern
  EN TS: He wants to remember every word in the world.
  de TS: Er will sich an jedes Wort der Welt erinnern.
  EN FS: He wants to forget every word in the world.
  de FS: Er will jedes Wort der Welt vergessen.
  EN TP: remembering words on cards
  de TP: sich an Wörter auf Karten erinnern
  EN FP: remembering a birthday
  de FP: sich an einen Geburtstag erinnern
4856 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: Lehrer
  EN TS: The teacher is behind a wall of paper.
  de TS: Der Lehrer sitzt hinter einer Wand aus Papier.
  EN FS: The teacher is behind a wall of books.
  de FS: Der Lehrer sitzt hinter einer Wand aus Büchern.
  EN TP: a teacher marking papers
  de TP: ein Lehrer korrigiert Arbeiten
  EN FP: a teacher reading a book
  de FP: ein Lehrer liest ein Buch
4857 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: Arbeiter
  EN TS: The worker shook it, and now it works!
  de TS: Der Arbeiter hat es geschüttelt, und jetzt geht es!
  EN FS: The worker kicked it, and now it works!
  de FS: Der Arbeiter hat es getreten, und jetzt geht es!
  EN TP: a worker with a scanner
  de TP: ein Arbeiter mit Scanner
  EN FP: a worker with a hammer
  de FP: ein Arbeiter mit Hammer
4858 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: Spirale
  EN TS: His domino spiral is enormous!
  de TS: Seine Domino-Spirale ist riesig!
  EN FS: His domino tower is enormous!
  de FS: Sein Domino-Turm ist riesig!
  EN TP: a spiral of dominoes
  de TP: eine Spirale aus Dominosteinen
  EN FP: a spiral notebook
  de FP: ein Spiralblock
4859 | piece (noun): a separate part of something bigger | loc: Stück
  EN TS: The pieces took over the room.
  de TS: Die Puzzlestücke haben das Zimmer erobert.
  EN FS: The toys took over the room.
  de FS: Die Spielsachen haben das Zimmer erobert.
  EN TP: fitting puzzle pieces
  de TP: Puzzlestücke zusammensetzen
  EN FP: a piece of cake
  de FP: ein Stück Kuchen
4860 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: Seifenblase | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc Seifenblase wrong for gas bubbles in a liquid; used Bläschen
  EN TS: The tablet makes bubbles.
  de TS: Die Tablette macht Bläschen.
  EN FS: The tablet makes sparks.
  de FS: Die Tablette macht Funken.
  EN TP: bubbles in a glass
  de TP: Bläschen in einem Glas
  EN FP: a bubble of chewing gum
  de FP: eine Kaugummiblase
4861 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: hören
  EN TS: Shh, she is listening!
  de TS: Pssst, sie hört zu!
  EN FS: Shh, she is sleeping!
  de FS: Pssst, sie schläft!
  EN TP: listening to a bird
  de TP: einem Vogel zuhören
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  de FP: dem Lehrer zuhören
4862 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: wählen
  EN TS: She can't choose a pumpkin.
  de TS: Sie kann einfach keinen Kürbis wählen.
  EN FS: She can't choose a hat.
  de FS: Sie kann einfach keinen Hut wählen.
  EN TP: choosing between two apples
  de TP: zwischen zwei Äpfeln wählen
  EN FP: choosing between two dresses
  de FP: zwischen zwei Kleidern wählen
4863 | plan (noun): a series of steps to reach a goal | loc: Plan
  EN TS: Her plan fills the whole wall.
  de TS: Ihr Plan füllt die ganze Wand.
  EN FS: Her plan fills the whole desk.
  de FS: Ihr Plan füllt den ganzen Schreibtisch.
  EN TP: a plan on the wall
  de TP: ein Plan an der Wand
  EN FP: a plan for a house
  de FP: ein Plan für ein Haus
4864 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: Uniform
  EN TS: The band is in uniform!
  de TS: Die Band trägt Uniform!
  EN FS: The band is in pyjamas!
  de FS: Die Band trägt Schlafanzug!
  EN TP: a band in uniform
  de TP: eine Band in Uniform
  EN FP: a school uniform
  de FP: eine Schuluniform
4865 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: Linse
  EN TS: His camera has a long lens.
  de TS: Seine Kamera hat eine lange Linse.
  EN FS: His camera has a short lens.
  de FS: Seine Kamera hat eine kurze Linse.
  EN TP: a long camera lens
  de TP: eine lange Kameralinse
  EN FP: a lens in her glasses
  de FP: eine Linse in ihrer Brille
4866 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: Drohne
  EN TS: A drone is hovering low. Nice shot!
  de TS: Eine Drohne schwebt tief. Starke Aufnahme!
  EN FS: A bird is hovering low. Nice shot!
  de FS: Ein Vogel schwebt tief. Starke Aufnahme!
  EN TP: a drone over the grass
  de TP: eine Drohne über dem Gras
  EN FP: a drone in the studio
  de FP: eine Drohne im Studio
4867 | thumb (noun): the short thick finger on your hand | loc: Daumen
  EN TS: She is giving two thumbs up.
  de TS: Sie zeigt zwei Daumen hoch.
  EN FS: She is giving two thumbs down.
  de FS: Sie zeigt zwei Daumen runter.
  EN TP: two thumbs up
  de TP: zwei Daumen hoch
  EN FP: a thumb on guitar strings
  de FP: ein Daumen auf Gitarrensaiten
4868 | program (verb): to write a computer program | loc: programmieren
  EN TS: They programmed it. It works!
  de TS: Sie haben es programmiert. Es läuft!
  EN FS: They programmed it. It broke!
  de FS: Sie haben es programmiert. Es ist kaputt!
  EN TP: programming a new app
  de TP: eine neue App programmieren
  EN FP: programming a washing machine
  de FP: eine Waschmaschine programmieren
4869 | design (noun): working out the form of something in a sketch | loc: Design
  EN TS: Design is her whole life.
  de TS: Design ist ihr ganzes Leben.
  EN FS: Football is her whole life.
  de FS: Fußball ist ihr ganzes Leben.
  EN TP: a logo design
  de TP: ein Logo-Design
  EN FP: a tattoo design
  de FP: ein Tattoo-Design
4870 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: Schaum
  EN TS: His face is covered in foam.
  de TS: Sein Gesicht ist voller Schaum.
  EN FS: His face is covered in mud.
  de FS: Sein Gesicht ist voller Schlamm.
  EN TP: foam on his cheek
  de TP: Schaum auf seiner Wange
  EN FP: foam on a beer
  de FP: Schaum auf einem Bier
4871 | registration (noun): the act of signing up or enrolling | loc: Anmeldung
  EN TS: The registration queue is endless.
  de TS: Die Schlange bei der Anmeldung ist endlos.
  EN FS: The registration queue is empty.
  de FS: Die Schlange bei der Anmeldung ist leer.
  EN TP: a registration desk
  de TP: der Schalter für die Anmeldung
  EN FP: a car registration plate
  de FP: die Anmeldung fürs Auto
4872 | rating (noun): a score showing the value of something | loc: Bewertung
  EN TS: Such a "strict" rating: always five stars.
  de TS: So eine „strenge“ Bewertung: immer fünf Sterne.
  EN FS: Such a "strict" rating: always one star.
  de FS: So eine „strenge“ Bewertung: immer ein Stern.
  EN TP: a five-star rating
  de TP: eine Fünf-Sterne-Bewertung
  EN FP: a one-star rating
  de FP: eine Ein-Stern-Bewertung
4873 | study (noun): using your mind to learn a subject by reading | loc: Studium
  EN TS: She is lost in study.
  de TS: Sie ist völlig im Studium versunken.
  EN FS: She is lost in a forest.
  de FS: Sie ist völlig im Wald verloren.
  EN TP: deep in study
  de TP: tief im Studium versunken
  EN FP: a medical study
  de FP: eine medizinische Studie
4874 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: Ampel
  EN TS: She stopped at a traffic light.
  de TS: Sie hat an einer Ampel gehalten.
  EN FS: She stopped at a busy gas station.
  de FS: Sie hat an einer vollen Tankstelle gehalten.
  EN TP: stopped at a traffic light
  de TP: an einer Ampel halten
  EN FP: a red traffic light
  de FP: eine rote Ampel
4875 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: Lastwagen
  EN TS: The team is loading the truck.
  de TS: Das Team belädt den Lastwagen.
  EN FS: The team is loading the boat.
  de FS: Das Team belädt das Boot.
  EN TP: a truck full of boxes
  de TP: ein Lastwagen voller Kisten
  EN FP: a truck full of sand
  de FP: ein Lastwagen voller Sand
4876 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: lächeln
  EN TS: Rain, but she is smiling.
  de TS: Regen, aber sie lächelt.
  EN FS: Rain, but she is crying.
  de FS: Regen, aber sie weint.
  EN TP: smiling at a puppy
  de TP: einen Welpen anlächeln
  EN FP: smiling at the bus driver
  de FP: den Busfahrer anlächeln
4877 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: sitzen
  EN TS: Now everybody is sitting!
  de TS: Jetzt sitzen alle!
  EN FS: Now everybody is standing!
  de FS: Jetzt stehen alle!
  EN TP: sitting in a full hall
  de TP: in einem vollen Saal sitzen
  EN FP: sitting in an empty bus
  de FP: in einem leeren Bus sitzen
4878 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: Steg
  EN TS: This guy is diving off the pier.
  de TS: Der Typ springt vom Steg.
  EN FS: This guy is diving off the boat.
  de FS: Der Typ springt vom Boot.
  EN TP: diving off a wooden pier
  de TP: vom Holzsteg springen
  EN FP: fishing off a wooden pier
  de FP: vom Holzsteg angeln
4879 | competition (noun): an event where a winner is chosen | loc: Wettbewerb
  EN TS: She is lifting a car in this competition!
  de TS: Sie hebt bei diesem Wettbewerb ein Auto hoch!
  EN FS: She is lifting a bike in this competition!
  de FS: Sie hebt bei diesem Wettbewerb ein Fahrrad hoch!
  EN TP: a strongwoman competition
  de TP: ein Strongwoman-Wettbewerb
  EN FP: a singing competition on TV
  de FP: ein Gesangswettbewerb im TV
4880 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: Flasche
  EN TS: A water bottle off the roof? Wild.
  de TS: Eine Wasserflasche vom Dach? Krass.
  EN FS: A chair off the roof? Totally wild.
  de FS: Ein Stuhl vom Dach? Total krass.
  EN TP: a big water bottle
  de TP: eine große Wasserflasche
  EN FP: a baby's milk bottle
  de FP: eine Babymilchflasche
4881 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: Bus
  EN TS: People are pushing a bus!
  de TS: Leute schieben einen Bus!
  EN FS: People are pushing a train!
  de FS: Leute schieben einen Zug!
  EN TP: pushing a city bus
  de TP: einen Stadtbus schieben
  EN FP: catching a city bus
  de FP: einen Stadtbus erwischen
4882 | aircraft (noun): a vehicle that can fly | loc: Luftfahrzeug
  EN TS: They are pulling an aircraft!
  de TS: Sie ziehen ein Luftfahrzeug!
  EN FS: They are pulling a truck!
  de FS: Sie ziehen einen Lastwagen!
  EN TP: pulling a huge aircraft
  de TP: ein riesiges Luftfahrzeug ziehen
  EN FP: an aircraft taking off
  de FP: ein startendes Luftfahrzeug
4883 | reveal (verb): to make something visible for everyone to see | loc: enthüllen
  EN TS: The doors reveal green hills.
  de TS: Die Türen enthüllen grüne Hügel.
  EN FS: The doors reveal a blue sea.
  de FS: Die Türen enthüllen ein blaues Meer.
  EN TP: revealing a green valley
  de TP: ein grünes Tal enthüllen
  EN FP: revealing a secret
  de FP: ein Geheimnis enthüllen
4884 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: zeigen
  EN TS: Everybody is pointing up!
  de TS: Alle zeigen nach oben!
  EN FS: Everybody is pointing down!
  de FS: Alle zeigen nach unten!
  EN TP: pointing at the sky
  de TP: auf den Himmel zeigen
  EN FP: pointing at a map
  de FP: auf eine Karte zeigen
4885 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: Straße
  EN TS: They are going up the street.
  de TS: Sie gehen die Straße hinauf.
  EN FS: They are going up the stairs.
  de FS: Sie gehen die Treppe hinauf.
  EN TP: a sunny cobbled street
  de TP: eine sonnige Straße mit Kopfsteinpflaster
  EN FP: a busy shopping street
  de FP: eine belebte Einkaufsstraße
4886 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: steil
  EN TS: The path is so steep.
  de TS: Der Weg ist so steil.
  EN FS: The path is so flat.
  de FS: Der Weg ist so flach.
  EN TP: a steep grassy path
  de TP: ein steiler Grasweg
  EN FP: a steep price
  de FP: ein steiler Preisanstieg
4887 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: schmal
  EN TS: Whoa, this path is narrow!
  de TS: Wow, dieser Weg ist schmal!
  EN FS: Whoa, this path is wide!
  de FS: Wow, dieser Weg ist breit!
  EN TP: a narrow canyon path
  de TP: ein schmaler Canyonweg
  EN FP: a narrow shop door
  de FP: eine schmale Ladentür
4888 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: barfuß
  EN TS: Everyone is walking barefoot!
  de TS: Alle laufen barfuß!
  EN FS: Everyone is running barefoot!
  de FS: Alle rennen barfuß!
  EN TP: walking barefoot on the sand
  de TP: barfuß über den Sand laufen
  EN FP: barefoot on hot stones
  de FP: barfuß auf heißen Steinen
4889 | circular (adjective): having the shape of a circle | loc: kreisförmig
  EN TS: The platform is circular.
  de TS: Die Plattform ist kreisförmig.
  EN FS: The platform is square.
  de FS: Die Plattform ist quadratisch.
  EN TP: a circular white platform
  de TP: eine kreisförmige weiße Plattform
  EN FP: a circular letter
  de FP: ein Rundschreiben
4890 | circle (verb): to travel around something in a ring | loc: umkreisen
  EN TS: Everyone is circling the top.
  de TS: Alle umkreisen den Kreisel.
  EN FS: Everyone is circling the tree.
  de FS: Alle umkreisen den Baum.
  EN TP: circling a spinning top
  de TP: einen Kreisel umkreisen
  EN FP: circling a football
  de FP: einen Fußball umkreisen
4891 | campus (noun): the grounds and buildings of a university | loc: Campus
  EN TS: The whole campus is leaning!
  de TS: Der ganze Campus lehnt sich zur Seite!
  EN FS: The whole campus is jumping!
  de FS: Der ganze Campus springt!
  EN TP: students on the campus lawn
  de TP: Studierende auf dem Campus-Rasen
  EN FP: a campus in the snow
  de FP: ein Campus im Schnee
4892 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: Shorts
  EN TS: Those swim shorts are so fast!
  de TS: Diese Badeshorts sind so schnell!
  EN FS: Those swim fins are so fast!
  de FS: Diese Schwimmflossen sind so schnell!
  EN TP: colourful swim shorts
  de TP: bunte Badeshorts
  EN FP: shorts for football
  de FP: Shorts für Fußball
4893 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: überfüllt
  EN TS: Crowded to the very top!
  de TS: Bis ganz oben überfüllt!
  EN FS: Crowded only at the bottom!
  de FS: Nur unten überfüllt!
  EN TP: a crowded baseball stadium
  de TP: ein überfülltes Baseballstadion
  EN FP: a crowded bus at night
  de FP: ein überfüllter Nachtbus
4894 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: still
  EN TS: Everyone is still. Very normal.
  de TS: Alle stehen still. Ganz normal.
  EN FS: Everyone is dancing. Very normal.
  de FS: Alle tanzen. Ganz normal.
  EN TP: still students in a hall
  de TP: stille Studierende in einer Halle
  EN FP: still water in a lake
  de FP: stilles Wasser in einem See
4895 | opposite (adjective): directly across from each other | loc: gegenüberliegend
  EN TS: They stand on opposite sides.
  de TS: Sie stehen auf gegenüberliegenden Seiten.
  EN FS: They stand on the same side.
  de FS: Sie stehen auf derselben Seite.
  EN TP: on opposite sides
  de TP: auf gegenüberliegenden Seiten
  EN FP: the opposite direction
  de FP: die entgegengesetzte Richtung
4896 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: Schatten
  EN TS: Everyone has a long shadow!
  de TS: Alle haben einen langen Schatten!
  EN FS: Everyone has a long scarf!
  de FS: Alle haben einen langen Schal!
  EN TP: long shadows on stones
  de TP: lange Schatten auf Steinen
  EN FP: shadows on a wall
  de FP: Schatten an einer Wand
4897 | join (verb): to become part of a group | loc: sich anschließen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is joining the hug!
  de TS: Alle schließen sich der Umarmung an!
  EN FS: Everyone is joining the dance!
  de FS: Alle schließen sich dem Tanz an!
  EN TP: joining a group hug
  de TP: sich einer Gruppenumarmung anschließen
  EN FP: joining a dance class
  de FP: sich einem Tanzkurs anschließen
4898 | panel (noun): a flat sheet that forms part of something | loc: Platte
  EN TS: They are fitting glass panels.
  de TS: Sie setzen Glasplatten ein.
  EN FS: They are fitting wood panels.
  de FS: Sie setzen Holzplatten ein.
  EN TP: fitting glass panels
  de TP: Glasplatten einsetzen
  EN FP: cleaning glass panels
  de FP: Glasplatten putzen
4899 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: riesig
  EN TS: That radish is enormous, dude!
  de TS: Der Rettich ist riesig, Alter!
  EN FS: That melon is enormous, dude!
  de FS: Die Melone ist riesig, Alter!
  EN TP: an enormous white radish
  de TP: ein riesiger weißer Rettich
  EN FP: an enormous pumpkin
  de FP: ein riesiger Kürbis
4900 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: Stapel
  EN TS: The tall stack fell over!
  de TS: Der hohe Stapel ist umgefallen!
  EN FS: The tall tree fell over!
  de FS: Der hohe Baum ist umgefallen!
  EN TP: a tall stack of pallets
  de TP: ein hoher Stapel Paletten
  EN FP: a stack of pancakes
  de FP: ein Stapel Pfannkuchen
4901 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: blau
  EN TS: Blue sea, blue sky, big dive.
  de TS: Blaues Meer, blauer Himmel, großer Sprung.
  EN FS: Blue pool, blue sky, big dive.
  de FS: Blauer Pool, blauer Himmel, großer Sprung.
  EN TP: diving into blue water
  de TP: ins blaue Wasser springen
  EN FP: diving into a blue pool
  de FP: in einen blauen Pool springen
4902 | submarine (noun): a warship that travels under water | loc: U-Boot
  EN TS: A submarine, then a whale. Swim faster!
  de TS: Ein U-Boot, dann ein Wal. Schneller schwimmen!
  EN FS: A submarine, then a shark. Swim faster!
  de FS: Ein U-Boot, dann ein Hai. Schneller schwimmen!
  EN TP: a submarine in a lake
  de TP: ein U-Boot im See
  EN FP: a submarine in a harbour
  de FP: ein U-Boot im Hafen
4903 | crowd (verb): to gather closely in large numbers | loc: sich zusammendrängen
  EN TS: Everyone is crowding the plaza. Why?
  de TS: Alle drängen sich auf dem Platz zusammen. Warum?
  EN FS: Cars are crowding the plaza. Why?
  de FS: Autos drängen sich auf dem Platz zusammen. Warum?
  EN TP: crowding into the square
  de TP: sich auf dem Platz zusammendrängen
  EN FP: crowding around a stage
  de FP: sich um eine Bühne zusammendrängen
